

Strategic Storage Growth Trust, Inc.














































Home
Search
Sign-In/Up
Contracts
Dictionary
Clauses
Companies
People

About
FAQ
Blog











Related Companies

AEI Core Property Income Trust, Inc
AMB Property Corporation
Aames Investment Corp
Acadia Realty Trust
Accredited Mortgage Loan REIT Trust
Aegis Realty Inc
Affordable Residential Communities
Ag Mortgage Investment Trust
Agree Realty Corporation
Alexander's, Inc.
Alternative Asset Management Acquisition Corp
AmREIT Monthly Income & Growth Fund III Ltd
AmREIT Monthly Income & Growth Fund IV LP
AmREIT, Inc
Ambassador Apartments Inc



        More Related Companies
      





Home



Sample Contracts



By Company


Strategic Storage Growth Trust, Inc.




Strategic Storage Growth Trust, Inc.





      Loading...
    





Former Names
Strategic Storage Opportunity Trust, Inc. (until 2013-07-09)Standard IndustryClassification
Real estate investment trustsAddress

111 Corporate Drive, Suite 120, Ladera Ranch, CA 92694
Phone
866-412-5161



Sample Contracts



Strategic Storage Growth Trust, Inc. –
Purchase and Sale Agreement
(January 26th, 2017)
THIS PURCHASE AND SALE AGREEMENT (this Agreement) is executed by and between VASF I CA SPV 1, LLC, a California limited liability company (Seller), and SSGT Acquisitions, LLC, a Delaware limited liability company (Purchaser).



Strategic Storage Growth Trust, Inc. –
Purchase and Sale Agreement
(August 29th, 2016)
THIS PURCHASE AND SALE AGREEMENT (this Agreement) is executed by and between SSGT Borden Park, LLC, a Delaware limited liability company (Seller), and Hixon Properties Incorporated, a Texas corporation (Purchaser).



Strategic Storage Growth Trust, Inc. –
Purchase and Sale Agreement
(April 13th, 2016)
THIS PURCHASE AND SALE AGREEMENT (this "Agreement") is executed by and between SSGT Borden Park, LLC, a Delaware limited liability company ("Seller"), and Din/Cal 3, Inc., a Texas corporation ("Purchaser").



Strategic Storage Growth Trust, Inc. –
Purchase and Sale Agreement
(February 11th, 2016)
THIS PURCHASE AND SALE AGREEMENT (this "Agreement") is executed by and between Storage Partners of Pembroke Pines, LLC, a Delaware limited liability company ("Seller"), and SSGT Acquisitions, LLC, a Delaware limited liability company ("Purchaser").



Strategic Storage Growth Trust, Inc. –
Assignment of Partial Interest in Agreement of Purchase and Sale
(January 8th, 2016)
NOW THEREFORE THIS AGREEMENT WITNESSES that, for good and valuable consideration, the receipt and sufficiency of which is hereby acknowledged, the parties hereto agree as follows:



Strategic Storage Growth Trust, Inc. –
Second Amendment to Credit Agreement
(December 22nd, 2015)
This SECOND AMENDMENT TO CREDIT AGREEMENT (Amendment) is dated as of December 17, 2015, and executed by SS GROWTH OPERATING PARTNERSHIP, L.P. and certain affiliated entities signatory hereto (hereinafter, collectively, Borrower), the Lenders, and KEYBANK NATIONAL ASSOCIATION, (hereinafter, the Administrative Agent), for itself and for the Lenders in consideration of mutual covenants contained herein and benefits to be derived herefrom. Unless otherwise defined herein, capitalized terms used herein shall have the same meaning provided for in the Original Credit Agreement.



Strategic Storage Growth Trust, Inc. –
Purchase and Sale Agreement
(November 19th, 2015)
THIS PURCHASE AND SALE AGREEMENT (this Agreement) is executed by and between Storage Spot Operations Inc., an Ontario corporation (the Seller), and SSGT Acquisitions, LLC, a Delaware limited liability company (Purchaser).



Strategic Storage Growth Trust, Inc. –
Assignment of Partial Interest in Agreement of Purchase and Sale
(November 19th, 2015)
NOW THEREFORE THIS AGREEMENT WITNESSES that, for good and valuable consideration, the receipt and sufficiency of which is hereby acknowledged, the parties hereto agree as follows:



Strategic Storage Growth Trust, Inc. –
Agreement of Purchase and Sale by and Between Alamo Heights/Star Storage, L.P.,
Borden Park, L.P., Kingwood Self-Storage, Lp and Arringtons Self Storage of
Aurora, L.P. And Ssgt Acquisitions, Llc
(November 2nd, 2015)
THIS AGREEMENT OF PURCHASE AND SALE (the Agreement) is made and entered into as of the 26th day of October, 2015 (the Effective Date), by and between ALAMO HEIGHTS/STAR STORAGE, L.P., a Texas limited partnership, BORDEN PARK, L.P., a Texas limited partnership, KINGWOOD SELF-STORAGE, LP, a Texas limited partnership, and ARRINGTONS SELF STORAGE OF AURORA, L.P., a Texas limited partnership (hereinafter collectively referred to as Seller), and SSGT ACQUISITIONS, LLC, a Delaware limited liability company (hereinafter referred to as Purchaser).



Strategic Storage Growth Trust, Inc. –
Amendment No. 2 to the Second Amended and Restated Limited Partnership
Agreement of Ss Growth Operating Partnership, L.P.
(September 28th, 2015)
In accordance with Section 4.2(a)(i) and Article 12 of the Second Amended and Restated Limited Partnership Agreement, effective as of July 31, 2014 (the Partnership Agreement), of SS Growth Operating Partnership, L.P. (the Partnership), the Partnership Agreement is hereby amended by this Amendment No. 2 thereto (this Amendment) to reflect certain changes in share classification of Strategic Storage Growth Trust, Inc. (the General Partner). Capitalized terms used and not otherwise defined herein shall have the meanings set forth in the Partnership Agreement.



Strategic Storage Growth Trust, Inc. –
Amendment No. 2 to the Second Amended and Restated Limited Partnership
Agreement of Ss Growth Operating Partnership, L.P.
(August 27th, 2015)
In accordance with Section 4.2(a)(i) and Article 12 of the Second Amended and Restated Limited Partnership Agreement, effective as of July 31, 2014 (the Partnership Agreement), of SS Growth Operating Partnership, L.P. (the Partnership), the Partnership Agreement is hereby amended by this Amendment No. 2 thereto (this Amendment) to reflect certain changes in share classification of Strategic Storage Growth Trust, Inc. (the General Partner). Capitalized terms used and not otherwise defined herein shall have the meanings set forth in the Partnership Agreement.



Strategic Storage Growth Trust, Inc. –
Purchase and Sale Agreement
(June 5th, 2015)
THIS PURCHASE AND SALE AGREEMENT (this Agreement) is executed by and between Arapahoe 5, LLC, an Arizona limited liability company (Seller), and SSGT Acquisitions, LLC, a Delaware limited liability company (Purchaser).



Strategic Storage Growth Trust, Inc. –
Employee and Director Long-Term Incentive Plan of Strategic Storage Growth
Trust, Inc.
(March 27th, 2015)




Strategic Storage Growth Trust, Inc. –
Second Amended and Restated Advisory Agreement by and Among Strategic Storage
Growth Trust, Inc., Ss Growth Operating Partnership, L.P. And Ss Growth
Advisor, Llc
(March 27th, 2015)
THIS SECOND AMENDED AND RESTATED ADVISORY AGREEMENT, dated as of January 20, 2015, is entered into among STRATEGIC STORAGE GROWTH TRUST, INC., a Maryland corporation (the Company), SS GROWTH OPERATING PARTNERSHIP, L.P., a Delaware limited partnership (the Operating Partnership) and SS GROWTH ADVISOR, LLC, a Delaware limited liability company (the Advisor).



Strategic Storage Growth Trust, Inc. –
Second Amended and Restated Advisory Agreement by and Among Strategic Storage
Growth Trust, Inc., Ss Growth Operating Partnership, L.P. And Ss Growth
Advisor, Llc
(January 15th, 2015)
THIS SECOND AMENDED AND RESTATED ADVISORY AGREEMENT, dated as of January     , 2015, is entered into among STRATEGIC STORAGE GROWTH TRUST, INC., a Maryland corporation (the Company), SS GROWTH OPERATING PARTNERSHIP, L.P., a Delaware limited partnership (the Operating Partnership) and SS GROWTH ADVISOR, LLC, a Delaware limited liability company (the Advisor).



Strategic Storage Growth Trust, Inc. –
Partial Assignment of Purchase and Sale Agreement
(September 29th, 2014)
This Partial Assignment of Purchase and Sale Agreement is made and entered into to be effective as of the 14th day of August, 2014, by and between Strategic Storage Opportunities, LLC, a Delaware limited liability company (herein, Assignor), and SSGT 7211 Arlington AVE, LLC, a Delaware limited liability company (herein, Assignee).



Strategic Storage Growth Trust, Inc. –
Schedule of Omitted Documents
(September 29th, 2014)
The following Partial Assignments of Purchase and Sale Agreement have not been filed as an exhibit pursuant to Instruction 2 of Item 601 of Regulation S-K; these documents are substantially identical in all material respects, except as noted below, to Exhibit 10.9 to this Form 8-K:



Strategic Storage Growth Trust, Inc. –
CREDIT AGREEMENT Dated as of July 31, 2014 Among SS GROWTH OPERATING
PARTNERSHIP, L.P. AND CERTAIN AFFILIATED ENTITIES, Collectively as Borrower and
the Lenders Party Hereto and KEYBANK, NATIONAL ASSOCIATION, as Administrative
Agent KEYBANC CAPITAL MARKETS, LLC, as Sole Book Runner and Sole Lead Arranger
(September 29th, 2014)
THIS CREDIT AGREEMENT (this Agreement) dated as of the 31st day of July, 2014 by and among each Borrower (as defined herein), the Lenders (as defined herein) and KeyBank as Administrative Agent (as defined herein).



Strategic Storage Growth Trust, Inc. –
Second Amended and Restated Limited Partnership Agreement of Ss Growth
Operating Partnership, L.P.
(September 29th, 2014)
SS Growth Operating Partnership, L.P. (the Partnership) was formed as a limited partnership under the laws of the State of Delaware, pursuant to a Certificate of Limited Partnership filed with the Office of the Secretary of State of the State of Delaware on March 13, 2013. This Second Amended and Restated Limited Partnership Agreement (Agreement) is entered into effective as of July 31, 2014 among Strategic Storage Growth Trust, Inc., a Maryland corporation (the General Partner), the Original Limited Partner and the Special Limited Partner set forth on Exhibit A hereto, and the Limited Partners party hereto from time to time. Capitalized terms used herein but not otherwise defined shall have the meanings given them in Article 1.



Strategic Storage Growth Trust, Inc. –
Ss Growth Operating Partnership, L.P. Series a Cumulative Redeemable Preferred
Unit Purchase Agreement
(September 29th, 2014)
THIS SERIES A CUMULATIVE REDEEMABLE PREFERRED UNIT PURCHASE AGREEMENT (this Agreement) is made and entered into this 31st day of July, 2014, by and among SS Growth Operating Partnership, L.P., a Delaware limited partnership (the Operating Partnership), Strategic Storage Growth Trust, Inc., a Maryland corporation and the sole general partner of the Operating Partnership (the Company), and SSTI Preferred Investor, LLC, a Delaware limited liability company (the Purchaser).



Strategic Storage Growth Trust, Inc. –
Purchase and Sale Agreement
(September 29th, 2014)
THIS PURCHASE AND SALE AGREEMENT (this Agreement) is made and entered into by and between those eight (8) certain entities listed on Schedule D attached hereto and made a part hereof by reference (collectively the Seller), and Strategic Storage Opportunities, LLC, a Delaware limited liability company (Purchaser).



Strategic Storage Growth Trust, Inc. –
Amendment No. 1 to the Second Amended and Restated Limited Partnership
Agreement of Ss Growth Operating Partnership, L.P. Establishing Series a
Cumulative Redeemable Preferred Units of Limited Partnership Interest
(September 29th, 2014)
In accordance with Section 4.2(a)(i) and Article 12 of the Second Amended and Restated Limited Partnership Agreement, effective as of July 31, 2014 (the Partnership Agreement), of SS Growth Operating Partnership, L.P. (the Partnership), the Partnership Agreement is hereby amended by this Amendment No. 1 thereto (this Amendment) to establish a series of up to 724,000 preferred units of limited partnership interest of the Partnership which shall be designated the Series A Cumulative Redeemable Preferred Units (the Preferred Units), having the rights, preferences, powers, privileges and restrictions, qualifications and limitations set forth below and which shall be issued to SSTI Preferred Investor, LLC (the Purchaser). Certain terms used herein are defined in Section 10 of Exhibit I hereto. Capitalized terms used and not otherwise defined herein shall have the meanings set forth in the Partnership Agreement.



Strategic Storage Growth Trust, Inc. –
Amended and Restated Advisory Agreement
(January 22nd, 2014)
This AMENDED AND RESTATED ADVISORY AGREEMENT (this Advisory Agreement), dated as of December 10, 2013, is entered into by and among Strategic Storage Growth Trust, Inc., a Maryland corporation (the Company), SS Growth Operating Partnership, L.P., a Delaware limited partnership (the Operating Partnership) and SS Growth Advisor, LLC, a Delaware limited liability company (the Advisor), on the following terms and conditions.



Strategic Storage Growth Trust, Inc. –
Second Amended and Restated Limited Partnership Agreement of Ss Growth
Operating Partnership, L.P.
(January 22nd, 2014)
SS Growth Operating Partnership, L.P. (the Partnership) was formed as a limited partnership under the laws of the State of Delaware, pursuant to a Certificate of Limited Partnership filed with the Office of the Secretary of State of the State of Delaware on March 13, 2013. This Second Amended and Restated Limited Partnership Agreement (Agreement) is entered into effective as of             , 2014 among Strategic Storage Growth Trust, Inc., a Maryland corporation (the General Partner), the Original Limited Partner and the Special Limited Partner set forth on Exhibit A hereto, and the Limited Partners party hereto from time to time. Capitalized terms used herein but not otherwise defined shall have the meanings given them in Article 1.













×









      Have an account? Sign in here.

Law Insider
Recover your password







No account? Register Now!


No account? Register Now!
Sign in
by using one of this services











or







Forgot your password?


Have an account? Sign in here.
Join Law Insider
for Free
by using one of this services











or







By registering you agree to our
      terms of service.








Strategic Storage Growth Trust, Inc. Acquires Newly-Constructed  - KSWO, Lawton, OK- Wichita Falls, TX: News, Weather, Sports. ABC, 24/7, Telemundo - 


















Strategic Storage Growth Trust, Inc. Acquires Newly-Constructed  - KSWO, Lawton, OK- Wichita Falls, TX: News, Weather, Sports. ABC, 24/7, Telemundo - Member Center:Create Account|Log InManage Account|Log Out

SITE SEARCHWEB SEARCH BY 



HomeNewsOne Tank Trips 2017NationalLocal NewsInternationalA Child Who HopesOklahoma HeadlinesPolitical Stories from the Associated PressTechEntertainmentRecallsWeatherMy First Alert Weather Radar Online5th SeasonWeather FAQSportsNews from the NFLHigh School SportsCameronOklahoma Sports HeadlinesNational SportsOUOSUOKC ThunderTexas Sports HeadlinesDallas CowboysTexas RangersVideo7 News Video On DemandMedwatchMedwatch ArticlesMedwatch VideosMedWatch BlogBusinessCommunityThis Week in TexomaLifestyle7News EditorialWhat's OnProgramming Schedule7-Too Programming guideTelemundo Program Guideabc.comAbout UsOn-Air Staff BiosKSWO-TV Coverage MapKSWO Job ListingsEEO ReportClosed Captioning on KSWO 7 NewsDownload the 7News appHow to use the First Alert 7 weather app










Strategic Storage Growth Trust, Inc. Acquires Newly-Constructed Self Storage Facility Near Charleston, South Carolina




Information contained on this page is provided by an independent third-party content provider. Frankly and this Site make no warranties or representations in connection therewith. If you are affiliated with this page and would like it removed please contact pressreleases@franklyinc.comSOURCE  Strategic Storage Growth Trust, Inc.CHARLESTON, S.C., July 19, 2017 /PRNewswire/ -- Strategic Storage Growth Trust, Inc. ("SSGT"), a public non-traded real estate investment trust sponsored by SmartStop Asset Management, LLC, announced today its purchase of a 500-unit, newly-constructed self storage facility in the Charleston, South Carolina suburb of Mount Pleasant for $5.7 million.    "This modern self storage facility is 100 percent climate controlled and easily accessible to renters via Interstate 526 and other heavily trafficked thoroughfares," said H. Michael Schwartz, chairman and chief executive officer. "The property presents an opportunity to add significant value to the portfolio of Strategic Storage Growth Trust as our professional management team leases up the facility, which is currently approximately 16 percent leased. This acquisition fits our investment strategy, which is to acquire attractive value-add opportunities."Located at 701 Wando Park Blvd., the three-story structure is situated on approximately 1.5 acres of land and includes roughly 48,000 rentable square feet.With this latest acquisition, the portfolio of SSGT is now comprised of more than 12,900 self storage units in 9 states.About Strategic Storage Growth Trust, Inc. (SSGT)SSGT is a public non-traded REIT that focuses on the acquisition, development, redevelopment and lease-up of self storage properties. The SSGT portfolio currently consists of 20 operating self storage facilities located in nine states comprising approximately 12,900 self storage units and approximately 1.5 million net rentable square feet of storage space. Additionally, SSGT owns two development properties in the Greater Toronto Area which will be comprised of approximately 1,700 self storage units and 170,000 net rentable square feet of storage space once completed, and one development property in Asheville, North Carolina which will be comprised of approximately 650 self storage units and 72,000 net rentable square feet of storage space once completed.About SmartStop Asset Management, LLC (SmartStop)SmartStop is a diversified real estate company focused on self storage assets, along with student and senior housing. SmartStop has a managed portfolio that currently includes more than 68,000 self storage units and 7.9 million net rentable square feet and approximately $1.3 billion of real estate assets under management. SmartStop is the asset manager for 109 self storage facilities located throughout the United States and Toronto, Canada and two student housing facilities. SmartStop is the sponsor of Strategic Storage Trust II, Inc., SSGT and Strategic Storage Trust IV, Inc., all public non-traded REITs focusing on self storage assets. The facilities offer affordable and accessible storage units for residential and commercial customers. In addition, they offer secure interior and exterior storage units as well as outside storage areas for vehicles, RVs and boats. Additional information is available at www.smartstopassetmanagement.com.This press release may contain certain forward-looking statements within the meaning of Section 27A of the Securities Act of 1933, as amended, and Section 21E of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as amended. Such forward-looking statements can generally be identified by our use of forward-looking terminology such as "may," "will," "expect," "intend," "anticipate," "estimate," "believe," "continue," or other similar words. Because such statements include risks, uncertainties and contingencies, actual results may differ materially from the expectations, intentions, beliefs, plans or predictions of the future expressed or implied by such forward-looking statements. These risks, uncertainties and contingencies include, but are not limited to: uncertainties relating to changes in general economic and real estate conditions; uncertainties relating to the implementation of our real estate investment strategy; uncertainties relating to financing availability and capital proceeds; uncertainties relating to the closing of property acquisitions; uncertainties related to the timing and availability of distributions; and other risk factors as outlined in SSGT's annual report. This is neither an offer nor a solicitation to purchase securities.ContactsJulie LeberDamon Elder                      Spotlight Marketing CommunicationsSpotlight Marketing Communications949.427.5172 ext. 703949.427.5172, ext. 702julie@spotlightmarcom.comdamon@spotlightmarcom.com  View original content with multimedia:http://www.prnewswire.com/news-releases/strategic-storage-growth-trust-inc-acquires-newly-constructed-self-storage-facility-near-charleston-south-carolina-300490847.html©2017 PR Newswire. All Rights Reserved.
























Can't Find Something? 




1401 SE 60th StreetLawton, OK 73501
(580) 355-7000


FCC Public File
nbowers@kswo.com
(580) 355-7000
EEO Report
Closed Captioning










Texas News Now






				All content © Copyright 2000 - 2017 Raycom Media. All Rights Reserved. For more information on this site, please read our Privacy Policy and Terms of Service.
        	






 



Strategic Storage Growth Trust



























SSGT Investment Opportunity Use Disclaimer
Use of this website is subject to its Terms and Conditions and our Privacy Policy. This material must be read in conjunction with the Strategic Storage Growth Trust, Inc. prospectus in order to understand all risks of any offering of securities to which this website relates. An investment in Strategic Storage Growth Trust, Inc. is subject to significant risks. A more detailed description of the risks associated with this offering is found in the section of the prospectus entitled “Risk Factors.” A summary of the risks can be found on the website. Investors should read and understand all of the risk factors before making a decision to invest in shares of our common stock.
If you agree to the Terms and Conditions and Privacy Policy of this website and have received a prospectus, click Accept.
I accept | I disagree










Home


Request Information


Financial Advisors


Contact Us




 



 About SSGT Executive Officers and Directors Letter To Potential Stockholders Press Room Governance Documents XBRL Interactive Data Corporate Organizational Actions SEC Filings Self Storage Industry Key Facts Industry Profile Demand Drivers Demographic Trends Investment Opportunity Property Gallery Questions and Answers Risk Factors Investor Documents

Advisors
Investors


 





 

















Home Page
Your investment opportunity
Strategic Storage Growth Trust, Inc. is engaging in a public offering of shares for the express purpose of investing in growth oriented properties within the self storage asset class. While many real estate investments focus on income as their primary objective, Strategic Storage Growth Trust, Inc. is targeting properties with a higher potential for capital appreciation.
 
Read more » 





 

Press Room


Strategic Storage Growth Trust, Inc. Reports 2016 Fourth Quarter and Year-End Results...
Strategic Storage Growth Trust, Inc. Reports Third Quarter 2016 Results...
More news »






 
Investor




Read more »





 
Advisor



Read more »






 

Property Portfolio




Browse all properties »











                    2017 © Strategic Storage Growth Trust, Inc. All Rights Reserved.
                    Select Capital Corporation is a member of FINRA/SIPC


Privacy Policy /
                    Terms & Conditions /
                    Site Map











Past performance is no indication of future results. It is possible to lose money on your investment. While the self storage industry may be resistant to recessions, there is no guarantee that a related investment will realize a profit or prevent against loss. Distributions are not guaranteed. Diversification does not ensure a profit or guarantee against a loss. The stability of a non-traded REIT stock price does not indicate stability in the value of the underlying properties in the portfolio which may fluctuate and may be worth less than the price initially paid for such properties.
No offering is made to New York residents except by a Prospectus filed with the Department of Law of the State of New York. The Attorney General of the State of New York has not passed on or endorsed the merits of these offerings. Use of this website is subject to the Terms and Conditions and Privacy Policy.
This website is neither an offer to sell nor a solicitation of an offer to buy any security. Only the Prospectus makes such an offer. Therefore, a copy of the Prospectus must be made available to you in connection with the Strategic Storage Growth Trust, Inc. offering. This advertising material must be read in conjunction with the Prospectus in order to fully understand all of the implications and risks of the offering of securities to which it relates. Please read the Prospectus in its entirety before investing for complete information and to learn more about the risks associated with this offering. Some of the more significant risks include the following: no public market currently exists for shares of our common stock and we may not list our shares on a national securities exchange before three to five years after completion of this offering, if at all; therefore, it may be difficult to sell your shares and if you sell your shares, it will likely be at a substantial discount; we cannot assure you if or when we will make cash distributions and we may pay distributions from sources other than our cash flows from operations, including from the net proceeds from our offerings, and we are not prohibited from undertaking such activities by our charter, bylaws or investment policies; this is an initial public offering; we have little prior operating history, and the prior performance of real estate programs sponsored by affiliates of our sponsor may not be indicative of our future results; this is a “best efforts” offering, if we are unable to raise substantial funds in this offering, we may not be able to invest in a diverse portfolio of real estate and real estate-related investments, and the value of your investment may fluctuate more widely with the performance of specific investments; we are a “blind pool” because we have not identified any properties to acquire with the net proceeds from this offering; there are substantial conflicts of interest among us and our sponsor, advisor, property manager and dealer manager; our advisor will face conflicts of interest relating to the purchase of properties, including conflicts with our sponsor and Strategic Storage Trust II, Inc., and such conflicts may not be resolved in our favor, which could adversely affect our investment opportunities; we have no employees and must depend on our advisor to select investments and conduct our operations, and there is no guarantee that our advisor will devote adequate time or resources to us;  we will pay substantial fees and expenses to our advisor, its affiliates and participating broker-dealers for the services they provide to us, which will reduce cash available for investment and distribution and we may be required to pay our advisor a significant distribution if our advisory agreement is involuntarily terminated; we may incur substantial debt, which could hinder our ability to pay distributions to our stockholders or could decrease the value of your investment; we may fail to qualify as a REIT, which could adversely affect our operations and our ability to make distributions; and our board of directors may change any of our investment objectives without your consent. 

 























 



 Strategic Storage Growth Trust, Inc. Reports 2017 First Quarter Results 
         










    










 













 











 



















Strategic Storage Growth Trust, Inc. Reports 2017 First Quarter Results
        																																												
              
















 News provided by
Strategic Storage Growth Trust, Inc.  
May 18, 2017, 14:16 ET









 Share this article




























































LADERA RANCH, Calif., May 18, 2017 /PRNewswire/ -- Strategic Storage Growth Trust, Inc. ("SSGT") announced strong increases in same-store revenues, net operating income ("NOI"), occupancy and annualized rent per occupied square footage as part of its overall operating results for the three months ended March 31, 2017. 








"Our strong performance during the first quarter demonstrates the execution of our strategy: acquiring quality assets with good lease-up potential and delivering growth through institutional management," said H. Michael Schwartz, chairman and chief executive officer of SSGT. "We also continued to expand our portfolio during the quarter with the acquisition of two lease-up properties in growing markets totaling $28.5 million."
First Quarter 2017 Highlights 

Increased same-store revenues and NOI by 20.1% and 38.9%, respectively, compared to the same period in 2016. 
Increased same-store average physical occupancy by approximately 9.1% to 93.2% from 84.1% compared to the same period in 2016. 
Increased same-store annualized rent per occupied square foot by approximately 8.1% to $11.51 from $10.65 compared to the same period in 2016.

Acquisitions 
Elk Grove Property
On January 13, 2017, SSGT closed on a self storage facility located in Elk Grove Village, IL. SSGT acquired the Elk Grove property for a purchase price of approximately $10.1 million. The property has approximately 800 units and 82,000 rentable square feet.
Garden Grove Property
On March 16, 2017, SSGT closed on a newly-converted self storage facility located in Garden Grove, CA. SSGT acquired the Garden Grove property for a purchase price of approximately $18.4 million. The property has approximately 960 units and 95,000 rentable square feet.
Closedown of Offering 
The closedown of SSGT's primary offering occurred on March 31, 2017.  Investors who submitted subscriptions in accordance with SSGT's close down procedures and were accepted by SSGT were admitted as stockholders effective as of March 31, 2017. As of May 15, 2017, SSGT had issued approximately 18.7 million Class A Shares and approximately 7.5 million Class T Shares for approximately $200.9 million and $79.0 million, respectively, in its offerings.
Quarterly Distribution 
On March 14, 2017, SSGT's board of directors declared a daily distribution in the amount of $0.0010958904 per share on outstanding shares of common stock, payable to both Class A and Class T stockholders of record of such shares shown on its books as of the close of business each day during the period commencing April 1, 2017 and ending June 30, 2017. Such distributions payable to each stockholder of record during the month will be paid the following month. 
Subsequent Events
Updated NAV
On April 13, 2017, the board of directors of SSGT, upon recommendation of its nominating and corporate governance committee, approved an estimated value per share of its common stock of $11.56 for its Class A Shares and Class T Shares based on the estimated value of SSGT's assets less the estimated value of its liabilities, or net asset value, divided by the number of shares outstanding on a fully diluted basis, calculated as of December 31, 2016. See SSGT's Current Report on Form 8-K filed with the SEC on April 17, 2017 for a description of the methodologies and assumptions used to determine, and the limitations of, the estimated value per share. 
DRP Offering
On May 5, 2017, SSGT filed with the SEC a Registration Statement on Form S-3, which incorporated its distribution reinvestment plan (the "DRP Offering") and registered up to an additional $115.6 million in shares under its DRP Offering. The DRP Offering may be terminated at any time upon 10 days' prior written notice to stockholders.
Asheville Portfolio 
On May 11, 2017, SSGT closed on two existing self storage facilities in Asheville, North Carolina for a purchase price of approximately $10.3 million. The properties combined have approximately 850 units and 115,000 rentable square feet.
Potential Acquisitions:
Riggs Road Property
On April 5, 2017, a subsidiary of SSGT executed a purchase and sale agreement with an unaffiliated third party for the acquisition of property that is being developed into a self storage facility located in Gilbert, AZ (the "Riggs Road Property"). The purchase price for the Riggs Road Property is approximately $10.0 million. SSGT expects the acquisition of the Riggs Road Property to close in the second or third quarter of 2018 after construction is complete on the self storage facility and a certificate of occupancy has been issued.
Wando Park Property
On May 9, 2017, SSGT entered into an assignment with its sponsor in which its sponsor assigned it a purchase and sale agreement with an unaffiliated third party for the acquisition of a self storage facility located in Mt. Pleasant, SC (the "Wando Park Property"). The purchase price for the Wando Park Property is approximately $5.7 million. The purchase price includes a provision for an additional purchase price payment of up to approximately $0.5 million that could become due based upon the property exceeding certain performance hurdles in its third year of operations. SSGT expects the acquisition of the Wando Park Property to close in the second or third quarter of 2017.
Deer Springs Property
On May 9, 2017, SSGT entered into an assignment with its sponsor in which its sponsor assigned it a purchase and sale agreement with an unaffiliated third party for the acquisition of property that is being developed into a self storage facility located in Las Vegas, NV (the "Deer Springs Property"). The purchase price for the Deer Springs Property is approximately $9.2 million. SSGT expects the acquisition of the Deer Springs Property to close in the first or second quarter of 2018 after construction is complete on the self storage facility and a certificate of occupancy has been issued.




 STRATEGIC STORAGE GROWTH TRUST, INC. AND SUBSIDIARIES 


 CONSOLIDATED BALANCE SHEETS 









 March 31,2017(Unaudited) 

 December 31,2016 


 ASSETS 





 Real estate facilities: 





 Land 
 $  30,108,291 

 $  24,315,650 


 Buildings 
 80,681,282 

 57,722,965 


 Site improvements 
 5,583,269 

 5,542,989 



 116,372,842 

 87,581,604 


 Accumulated depreciation 
 (3,970,128 ) 

 (3,300,523 ) 



 112,402,714 

 84,281,081 


 Construction in process 
 2,839,546 

 2,174,191 


 Real estate facilities, net 
 115,242,260 

 86,455,272 


 Cash and cash equivalents 
 85,027,632 

 3,642,631 


 Other assets, net 
 8,023,979 

 3,156,769 


 Debt issuance costs, net 
 155,254 

 292,160 


 Intangible assets, net 
 197,555 

 391,143 








 Total assets 
 $ 208,646,680 

 $  93,937,975 








 LIABILITIES AND EQUITY 





 Secured debt, net 
 $    4,854,773 

 $  12,509,308 


 Accounts payable and accrued liabilities 
 1,627,650 

 1,499,984 


 Due to affiliates 
 3,613,033 

 963,535 


 Distributions payable 
 566,058 

 305,764 








 Total liabilities 
 10,661,514 

 15,278,591 








 Commitments and contingencies 





 Redeemable common stock 
 1,650,898 

 1,086,603 








 Equity: 





 Strategic Storage Growth Trust, Inc. equity: 





 Preferred Stock, $0.001 par value; 200,000,000 shares authorized; none issued and outstanding at March 31, 2017 and December 31, 2016 
 — 

 — 


 Class A Common stock, $0.001 par value; 350,000,000 shares authorized; 16,678,676 and 8,607,246 shares issued and outstanding at March 31, 2017 and December 31, 2016, respectively 
 16,678 

 8,607 


 Class T Common stock, $0.001 par value; 350,000,000 shares authorized; 5,992,046 and 1,716,957 issued and outstanding at March 31, 2017 and December 31, 2016, respectively 
 5,992 

 1,717 


 Additional paid-in capital 
 213,538,960 

 92,442,198 


 Distributions 
 (3,310,630 ) 

 (2,010,167 ) 


 Accumulated deficit 
 (13,745,687 ) 

 (12,655,490 ) 


 Accumulated other comprehensive income 
 (106,662) 

 (153,079 ) 


 Total Strategic Storage Growth Trust, Inc. equity 
 196,398,651 

 77,633,786 


 Noncontrolling interests in our Operating Partnership 
 (64,383) 

 (61,005 ) 


 Total equity 
 196,334,268 

 77,572,781 


 Total liabilities and equity 
 $ 208,646,680 

 $  93,937,975 









 STRATEGIC STORAGE GROWTH TRUST, INC. AND SUBSIDIARIES 


 CONSOLIDATED STATEMENTS OF OPERATIONS 


 (Unaudited) 








 Three Months Ended March 31, 



 2017 

 2016 


 Revenues: 





 Self storage rental revenue 
 $ 2,686,487 

 $ 2,055,181 


 Ancillary operating revenue 
 17,944 

 17,704 


 Total revenues 
 2,704,431 

 2,072,885 








 Operating expenses: 





 Property operating expenses 
 1,149,496 

 909,932 


 Property operating expenses – affiliates 
 299,327 

 218,826 


 General and administrative 
 581,134 

 581,881 


 Depreciation 
 679,105 

 502,495 


 Intangible amortization expense 
 198,588 

 392,319 


 Acquisition expense – affiliates 
 609,019 

 305,911 


 Other property acquisition expenses 
 102,806 

 67,886 


 Total operating expenses 
 3,619,475 

 2,979,250 








 Operating loss 
 (915,044 ) 

 (906,365 ) 


 Other income (expenses): 





 Interest expense 
 (15,100 ) 

 (440,268 ) 


 Interest expense – debt issuance costs 
 (148,239 ) 

 (173,597 ) 


 Other 
 (13,209) 

 229 








 Net loss 
 (1,091,592 ) 

 (1,520,001 ) 


 Less: Distributions to preferred unitholders in our Operating Partnership 
 — 

 (484,055 ) 


 Less: Accretion of preferred equity costs 
 — 

 (29,967 ) 


 Net loss attributable to the noncontrolling interests in our Operating Partnership 
 1,395 

 12,430 








 Net loss attributable to Strategic Storage Growth Trust, Inc. common stockholders 
 $ (1,090,197 ) 

 $ (2,021,593 ) 








 Net loss per Class A share—basic and diluted 
 $          (0.08 ) 

 $          (0.63 ) 


 Net loss per Class T share—basic and diluted 
 $          (0.08 ) 

 $          (0.63 ) 








 Weighted average Class A shares outstanding—basic and diluted 
 10,981,585 

 3,168,283 


 Weighted average Class T shares outstanding—basic and diluted 
 2,948,658 

 49,849 














 STRATEGIC STORAGE GROWTH TRUST, INC. AND SUBSIDIARIES 


 NON-GAAP MEASURE – COMPUTATION OF FUNDS FROM OPERATIONS 


 (Unaudited) 









 Three MonthsEndedMarch 31,2017 

 Three MonthsEndedMarch 31,2016 


 Net loss attributable to Strategic Storage Growth Trust, Inc. common stockholders(1) 
 $ (1,090,197) 

 $ (2,021,593) 


 Add: 





 Depreciation 
 669,605 

 498,376 


 Amortization of intangible assets 
 198,588 

 392,319 


 Deduct: 





 Adjustment for noncontrolling interests 
 (1,210) 

 (5,247) 


 FFO 
 (223,214) 

 (1,136,145) 


 Other Adjustments: 





 Acquisition expenses(2) 
 711,825 

 373,797 


 Adjustment for noncontrolling interests 
 (960) 

 (2,553) 


 MFFO 
 $     487,651 

 $(764,901) 




SSGT's results of operations for the three months ended March 31, 2017 and 2016 have been significantly impacted by a favorable increase in same store results of approximately $0.3 million, a decrease in interest expense of approximately $0.4 million, and a decrease in distributions to preferred interest holders of approximately $0.5 million. 




 (1) 
 Net loss attributable to SSGT's common stockholders for the three months ended March 31, 2017 and 2016 included none and approximately $0.5 million, respectively, in distributions to preferred unitholders in SSGT's operating partnership and none and approximately $30,000, respectively, in accretion of preferred equity costs. As of December 31, 2016, SSGT had redeemed all of the preferred units.      


 (2) 
 In evaluating investments in real estate, SSGT differentiates the costs to acquire the investment from the operations derived from the investment. Such information would be comparable only for publicly registered, non-traded REITs that have generally completed their acquisition activity and have other similar operating characteristics. By excluding expensed acquisition related expenses, SSGT believes MFFO provides useful supplemental information that is comparable for each type of real estate investment and is consistent with management's analysis of the investing and operating performance of its properties. Acquisition fees and expenses include payments to SSGT's advisor and third parties. Acquisition related expenses under GAAP are considered operating expenses and as expenses included in the determination of net income (loss) and income (loss) from continuing operations, both of which are performance measures under GAAP. All paid and accrued acquisition fees and expenses will have negative effects on returns to investors, the potential for future distributions, and cash flows generated by SSGT, unless earnings from operations or net sales proceeds from the disposition of other properties are generated to cover the purchase price of the property, these fees and expenses and other costs related to such property. 







 Non-cash Items Included in Net Loss:  







 Provided below is additional information related to selected non-cash items included in net loss above, which may be helpful in assessing SSGT's operating results: 





 • 
 Debt issuance costs of approximately $148,000 and $174,000, respectively, were recognized for the three months ended March 31, 2017 and 2016. 




ADDITIONAL INFORMATION REGARDING NOI, FFO, and MFFO
Net Operating Income ("NOI") 
NOI is a non-GAAP measure that SSGT defines as net income (loss), computed in accordance with GAAP, generated from properties before corporate general and administrative expenses, asset management fees, interest expense, depreciation, amortization, acquisition expenses and other non-property related expenses. SSGT believes that NOI is useful for investors as it provides a measure of the operating performance of its operating assets because NOI excludes certain items that are not associated with the operation of the properties. Additionally, SSGT believes that NOI is a widely accepted measure of comparative operating performance in the real estate community. However, SSGT's use of the term NOI may not be comparable to that of other real estate companies as they may have different methodologies for computing this amount. 
Funds from Operations ("FFO") and Modified Funds from Operations ("MFFO") 
Due to certain unique operating characteristics of real estate companies, the National Association of Real Estate Investment Trusts, or NAREIT, an industry trade group, has promulgated a measure known as funds from operations, or FFO, which SSGT believes to be an appropriate supplemental measure to reflect the operating performance of a REIT. The use of FFO is recommended by the REIT industry as a supplemental performance measure. FFO is not equivalent to SSGT's net income (loss) as determined under GAAP. 
SSGT defines FFO, a non-GAAP measure, consistent with the standards established by the White Paper on FFO approved by the Board of Governors of NAREIT, as revised in February 2004, or the White Paper. The White Paper defines FFO as net income (loss) computed in accordance with GAAP, excluding gains or losses from sales of property and asset impairment write downs, plus depreciation and amortization, and after adjustments for unconsolidated partnerships and joint ventures. Adjustments for unconsolidated partnerships and joint ventures are calculated to reflect FFO on the same basis. SSGT's FFO calculation complies with NAREIT's policy described above. 
The historical accounting convention used for real estate assets requires straight-line depreciation of buildings and improvements, which implies that the value of real estate assets diminishes predictably over time. Diminution in value may occur if such assets are not adequately maintained or repaired and renovated as required by relevant circumstances or other measures necessary to maintain the assets are not undertaken. However, SSGT believes that, since real estate values historically rise and fall with market conditions, including inflation, interest rates, the business cycle, unemployment and consumer spending, presentations of operating results for a REIT using historical accounting for depreciation may be less informative. In addition, in the determination of FFO, SSGT believes it is appropriate to disregard impairment charges, as this is a fair value adjustment that is largely based on market fluctuations and assessments regarding general market conditions which can change over time. An asset will only be evaluated for impairment if certain impairment indications exist and if the carrying value, or book value, exceeds the total estimated undiscounted future cash flows (including net rental revenues, net proceeds on the sale of the property, and any other ancillary cash flows at a property or group level under GAAP) from such asset. Testing for impairment is a continuous process and is analyzed on a quarterly basis. Investors should note, however, that determinations of whether impairment charges have been incurred are based partly on anticipated operating performance, because estimated undiscounted future cash flows from a property, including estimated future net rental revenues, net proceeds on the sale of the property, and certain other ancillary cash flows, are taken into account in determining whether an impairment charge has been incurred. While impairment charges are excluded from the calculation of FFO as described above, investors are cautioned that due to the fact that impairments are based on estimated future undiscounted cash flows and that SSGT intends to have a relatively limited term of its operations; it could be difficult to recover any impairment charges through the eventual sale of the property. To date, SSGT has not recognized any impairments. 
Historical accounting for real estate involves the use of GAAP. Any other method of accounting for real estate such as the fair value method cannot be construed to be any more accurate or relevant than the comparable methodologies of real estate valuation found in GAAP. Nevertheless, SSGT believes that the use of FFO, which excludes the impact of real estate related depreciation and amortization and impairments, assists in providing a more complete understanding of its performance to investors and to its management, and when compared year over year, reflects the impact on SSGT's operations from trends in occupancy rates, rental rates, operating costs, general and administrative expenses, and interest costs, which may not be immediately apparent from net income (loss). 
However, FFO or modified funds from operations ("MFFO"), discussed below, should not be construed to be more relevant or accurate than the current GAAP methodology in calculating net income (loss) or in its applicability in evaluating SSGT's operating performance. The method utilized to evaluate the value and performance of real estate under GAAP should be considered a more relevant measure of operational performance and is, therefore, given more prominence than the non-GAAP FFO and MFFO measures and the adjustments to GAAP in calculating FFO and MFFO. 
Changes in the accounting and reporting rules under GAAP that were put into effect and other changes to GAAP accounting for real estate subsequent to the establishment of NAREIT's definition of FFO have prompted an increase in cash-settled expenses, specifically acquisition fees and expenses, that are expensed as operating expenses under GAAP. SSGT believes these fees and expenses do not affect its overall long-term operating performance. Publicly registered, non-traded REITs typically have a significant amount of acquisition activity and are substantially more dynamic during their initial years of investment and operation. The purchase of properties, and the corresponding expenses associated with that process, is a key feature of SSGT's business plan in order to generate operational income and cash flow in order to make distributions to investors. While other start-up entities may also experience significant acquisition activity during their initial years, SSGT believes that publicly registered, non-traded REITs are unique in that they typically have a limited life with targeted exit strategies within a relatively limited time frame after the acquisition activity ceases. As disclosed in the prospectus for SSGT's offering, SSGT will use the proceeds raised in its offering to acquire properties and SSGT expects to begin the process of achieving a liquidity event (i.e., listing of its shares of common stock on a national securities exchange, a merger or sale, the sale of all or substantially all of its assets, or another similar transaction) within three to five years after the completion of its offering, which is generally comparable to other publicly registered, non-traded REITs. Thus, SSGT does not intend to continuously purchase assets and intends to have a limited life. The decision whether to engage in any liquidity event is in the sole discretion of the board of directors of SSGT. Due to the above factors and other unique features of publicly registered, non-traded REITs, the Investment Program Association, or the IPA, an industry trade group, has standardized a measure known as MFFO, which the IPA has recommended as a supplemental measure for publicly registered, non-traded REITs and which SSGT believes to be another appropriate supplemental measure to reflect the operating performance of a publicly registered, non-traded REIT having the characteristics described above. MFFO is not equivalent to SSGT's net income (loss) as determined under GAAP, and MFFO may not be a useful measure of the impact of long-term operating performance on value if SSGT does not ultimately engage in a liquidity event. SSGT believes that, because MFFO excludes acquisition fees and expenses that affect its operations only in periods in which properties are acquired and that SSGT considers more reflective of investing activities, as well as other non-operating items included in FFO, MFFO can provide, on a going-forward basis, an indication of the sustainability (that is, the capacity to continue to be maintained) of SSGT's operating performance after the period in which it is acquiring properties and once its portfolio is in place. By providing MFFO, SSGT believes it is presenting useful information that assists investors and analysts to better assess the sustainability of its operating performance after its offering has been completed and its properties have been acquired. SSGT also believes that MFFO is a recognized measure of sustainable operating performance by the publicly registered, non-traded REIT industry. Further, SSGT believes MFFO is useful in comparing the sustainability of its operating performance after its offering and acquisitions are completed with the sustainability of the operating performance of other real estate companies that are not as involved in acquisition activities. Investors are cautioned that MFFO should only be used to assess the sustainability of SSGT's operating performance after its offering has been completed and properties have been acquired, as it excludes acquisition fees and expenses that have a negative effect on SSGT's operating performance during the periods in which properties are acquired. 
SSGT defines MFFO, a non-GAAP measure, consistent with the IPA's Guideline 2010-01, Supplemental Performance Measure for Publicly Registered, Non-Listed REITs: Modified Funds From Operations (the "Practice Guideline") issued by the IPA in November 2010. The Practice Guideline defines MFFO as FFO further adjusted for the following items included in the determination of GAAP net income (loss): acquisition fees and expenses; amounts relating to straight line rents and amortization of above or below intangible lease assets and liabilities; accretion of discounts and amortization of premiums on debt investments; non-recurring impairments of real estate related investments; mark-to-market adjustments included in net income; non-recurring gains or losses included in net income from the extinguishment or sale of debt, hedges, foreign exchange, derivatives or securities holdings where trading of such holdings is not a fundamental attribute of the business plan, unrealized gains or losses resulting from consolidation from, or deconsolidation to, equity accounting, adjustments relating to contingent purchase price obligations included in net income, and after adjustments for consolidated and unconsolidated partnerships and joint ventures, with such adjustments calculated to reflect MFFO on the same basis. The accretion of discounts and amortization of premiums on debt investments, unrealized gains and losses on hedges, foreign exchange, derivatives or securities holdings, unrealized gains and losses resulting from consolidations, as well as other listed cash flow adjustments are adjustments made to net income (loss) in calculating cash flows from operations and, in some cases, reflect gains or losses which are unrealized and may not ultimately be realized. 
SSGT's MFFO calculation complies with the IPA's Practice Guideline described above. In calculating MFFO, SSGT excludes acquisition related expenses. The other adjustments included in the IPA's Practice Guideline are not applicable to SSGT for the periods presented. Acquisition fees and expenses are paid in cash by SSGT, and it has not set aside or put into escrow any specific amount of proceeds from its offering to be used to fund acquisition fees and expenses. SSGT does not intend to fund acquisition fees and expenses in the future from operating revenues and cash flows, nor from the sale of properties and subsequent re-deployment of capital and concurrent incurring of acquisition fees and expenses. Acquisition fees and expenses include payments to SSGT's advisor and third parties. Acquisition related expenses under GAAP are considered operating expenses and as expenses included in the determination of net income (loss) and income (loss) from continuing operations, both of which are performance measures under GAAP. All paid and accrued acquisition fees and expenses will have negative effects on returns to investors, the potential for future distributions, and cash flows generated by SSGT, unless earnings from operations or net sales proceeds from the disposition of other properties are generated to cover the purchase price of the property, these fees and expenses and other costs related to such property. In the future, if SSGT is not able to raise additional proceeds from its offering, this could result in SSGT paying acquisition fees or reimbursing acquisition expenses due to its advisor, or a portion thereof, with net proceeds from borrowed funds, operational earnings or cash flows, net proceeds from the sale of properties, or ancillary cash flows. As a result, the amount of proceeds available for investment and operations would be reduced, or SSGT may incur additional interest expense as a result of borrowed funds. 
Further, under GAAP, certain contemplated non-cash fair value and other non-cash adjustments are considered operating non-cash adjustments to net income (loss) in determining cash flows from operations. In addition, SSGT views fair value adjustments of derivatives and the amortization of fair value adjustments related to debt as items which are unrealized and may not ultimately be realized or as items which are not reflective of on-going operations and are therefore typically adjusted for when assessing operating performance. 
SSGT uses MFFO and the adjustments used to calculate it in order to evaluate its performance against other publicly registered, non-traded REITs which intend to have limited lives with short and defined acquisition periods and targeted exit strategies shortly thereafter. As noted above, MFFO may not be a useful measure of the impact of long-term operating performance if SSGT does not continue to operate in this manner. SSGT believes that its use of MFFO and the adjustments used to calculate it allow it to present its performance in a manner that reflects certain characteristics that are unique to publicly registered, non-traded REITs, such as their limited life, limited and defined acquisition period and targeted exit strategy, and hence that the use of such measures may be useful to investors. For example, acquisition fees and expenses are intended to be funded from the proceeds of SSGT's offering and other financing sources and not from operations. By excluding expensed acquisition fees and expenses, the use of MFFO provides information consistent with management's analysis of the operating performance of the properties. Additionally, fair value adjustments, which are based on the impact of current market fluctuations and underlying assessments of general market conditions, but can also result from operational factors such as rental and occupancy rates, may not be directly related or attributable to SSGT's current operating performance. By excluding such charges that may reflect anticipated and unrealized gains or losses, SSGT believes MFFO provides useful supplemental information. 
Presentation of this information is intended to provide useful information to investors as they compare the operating performance of different REITs, although it should be noted that not all REITs calculate FFO and MFFO the same way, so comparisons with other REITs may not be meaningful. Furthermore, FFO and MFFO are not necessarily indicative of cash flow available to fund cash needs and should not be considered as an alternative to net income (loss) or income (loss) from continuing operations as an indication of SSGT's performance, as an alternative to cash flows from operations, which is an indication of SSGT's liquidity, or indicative of funds available to fund SSGT's cash needs including its ability to make distributions to its stockholders. FFO and MFFO should be reviewed in conjunction with other measurements as an indication of SSGT's performance. MFFO may be useful in assisting management and investors in assessing the sustainability of operating performance in future operating periods, and in particular, after the offering and acquisition stages are complete. 
 Neither the SEC, NAREIT, nor any other regulatory body has passed judgment on the acceptability of the adjustments that SSGT uses to calculate FFO or MFFO. In the future, the SEC, NAREIT or another regulatory body may decide to standardize the allowable adjustments across the publicly registered, non-traded REIT industry and SSGT would have to adjust its calculation and characterization of FFO or MFFO.
About Strategic Storage Growth Trust, Inc. ("SSGT"): 
SSGT is a public non-traded REIT that focuses on the acquisition, development, redevelopment and lease-up of self storage properties. The SSGT portfolio currently consists of 18 operating self storage facilities located in eight states comprising approximately 11,900 self storage units and approximately 1.4 million net rentable square feet of storage space. Additionally, SSGT owns two development properties in the Greater Toronto Area which will be comprised of approximately 1,700 self storage units and 170,000 net rental square feet of storage space once completed, and one development property in Asheville, North Carolina which will be comprised of approximately 650 self storage units and 72,000 net rental square feet of storage space once completed.
About SmartStop Asset Management, LLC ("SmartStop"):
SmartStop is a diversified real estate company focused on self storage assets, along with student and senior housing. SmartStop has a managed portfolio that currently includes more than 67,000 self storage units and approximately 7.8 million rentable square feet and approximately $1 billion of real estate assets under management. SmartStop is the asset manager for 107 self storage facilities located throughout the United States and Toronto, Canada and one student housing facility. SmartStop is the sponsor of Strategic Storage Trust II, Inc., SSGT and Strategic Storage Trust IV, Inc., all public non-traded REITs focusing on self storage assets. The facilities offer affordable and accessible storage units for residential and commercial customers. In addition, they offer secure interior and exterior storage units as well as outside storage areas for vehicles, RVs and boats. Additional information is available at www.smartstopassetmanagement.com. 
This press release may contain certain forward-looking statements within the meaning of Section 27A of the Securities Act of 1933, as amended, and Section 21E of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as amended. Such forward-looking statements can generally be identified by our use of forward-looking terminology such as "may," "will," "expect," "intend," "anticipate," "estimate," "believe," "continue," or other similar words. Because such statements include risks, uncertainties and contingencies, actual results may differ materially from the expectations, intentions, beliefs, plans or predictions of the future expressed or implied by such forward-looking statements. These risks, uncertainties and contingencies include, but are not limited to: uncertainties relating to changes in general economic and real estate conditions; uncertainties relating to the implementation of our real estate investment strategy; uncertainties relating to financing availability and capital proceeds; uncertainties relating to the closing of property acquisitions; uncertainties related to the timing and availability of distributions; and other risk factors as outlined in the Company's public filings with the Securities and Exchange Commission. This is neither an offer nor a solicitation to purchase securities. 
 
To view the original version on PR Newswire, visit:http://www.prnewswire.com/news-releases/strategic-storage-growth-trust-inc-reports-2017-first-quarter-results-300460240.html
SOURCE Strategic Storage Growth Trust, Inc.



 

















May 24, 2017, 15:40 ET
Preview: Strategic Storage Growth Trust, Inc. Acquires 510-Unit Newly Constructed Self Storage Facility in Sarasota, Florida




















May 15, 2017, 17:31 ET
Preview: Strategic Storage Growth Trust, Inc. Acquires 850-Unit Self Storage Portfolio in Asheville, N.C. for $10.25 Million








My News


  Release contains wide tables.	  View fullscreen.






 Also from this source




 











Jul 19, 2017, 12:54 ET
                                  				                                                                                     
                              Strategic Storage Growth Trust, Inc. Acquires Newly-Constructed...








 











May 24, 2017, 15:40 ET
                                  				                                                                                     
                              Strategic Storage Growth Trust, Inc. Acquires 510-Unit Newly...





 Explore
 More news releases in similar topics

  Banking & Financial Services
  Real Estate
  Commercial Real Estate
Dividends
Earnings Forecasts & Projections








 You just read:
Strategic Storage Growth Trust, Inc. Reports 2017 First Quarter Results


 News provided by
Strategic Storage Growth Trust, Inc.  
May 18, 2017, 14:16 ET








 Share this article









































 











Looking to send a news release with PR Newswire?
Take advantage of the world's leading distribution platform.
Sign up to get started
Request more information
Have an account? Log In

















Search











Searching for your content...









Advanced Search












































 























 



 Strategic Storage Growth Trust, Inc. Acquires Newly-Constructed Self Storage Facility Near 
         










    










 













 











 



















Strategic Storage Growth Trust, Inc. Acquires Newly-Constructed Self Storage Facility Near Charleston, South Carolina
        																																						
              
















 News provided by
Strategic Storage Growth Trust, Inc.  
Jul 19, 2017, 12:54 ET









 Share this article




























































CHARLESTON, S.C., July 19, 2017 /PRNewswire/ -- Strategic Storage Growth Trust, Inc. ("SSGT"), a public non-traded real estate investment trust sponsored by SmartStop Asset Management, LLC, announced today its purchase of a 500-unit, newly-constructed self storage facility in the Charleston, South Carolina suburb of Mount Pleasant for $5.7 million. 








"This modern self storage facility is 100 percent climate controlled and easily accessible to renters via Interstate 526 and other heavily trafficked thoroughfares," said H. Michael Schwartz, chairman and chief executive officer. "The property presents an opportunity to add significant value to the portfolio of Strategic Storage Growth Trust as our professional management team leases up the facility, which is currently approximately 16 percent leased. This acquisition fits our investment strategy, which is to acquire attractive value-add opportunities."
Located at 701 Wando Park Blvd., the three-story structure is situated on approximately 1.5 acres of land and includes roughly 48,000 rentable square feet.
With this latest acquisition, the portfolio of SSGT is now comprised of more than 12,900 self storage units in 9 states.
About Strategic Storage Growth Trust, Inc. (SSGT)SSGT is a public non-traded REIT that focuses on the acquisition, development, redevelopment and lease-up of self storage properties. The SSGT portfolio currently consists of 20 operating self storage facilities located in nine states comprising approximately 12,900 self storage units and approximately 1.5 million net rentable square feet of storage space. Additionally, SSGT owns two development properties in the Greater Toronto Area which will be comprised of approximately 1,700 self storage units and 170,000 net rentable square feet of storage space once completed, and one development property in Asheville, North Carolina which will be comprised of approximately 650 self storage units and 72,000 net rentable square feet of storage space once completed.
About SmartStop Asset Management, LLC (SmartStop)SmartStop is a diversified real estate company focused on self storage assets, along with student and senior housing. SmartStop has a managed portfolio that currently includes more than 68,000 self storage units and 7.9 million net rentable square feet and approximately $1.3 billion of real estate assets under management. SmartStop is the asset manager for 109 self storage facilities located throughout the United States and Toronto, Canada and two student housing facilities. SmartStop is the sponsor of Strategic Storage Trust II, Inc., SSGT and Strategic Storage Trust IV, Inc., all public non-traded REITs focusing on self storage assets. The facilities offer affordable and accessible storage units for residential and commercial customers. In addition, they offer secure interior and exterior storage units as well as outside storage areas for vehicles, RVs and boats. Additional information is available at www.smartstopassetmanagement.com.
This press release may contain certain forward-looking statements within the meaning of Section 27A of the Securities Act of 1933, as amended, and Section 21E of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as amended. Such forward-looking statements can generally be identified by our use of forward-looking terminology such as "may," "will," "expect," "intend," "anticipate," "estimate," "believe," "continue," or other similar words. Because such statements include risks, uncertainties and contingencies, actual results may differ materially from the expectations, intentions, beliefs, plans or predictions of the future expressed or implied by such forward-looking statements. These risks, uncertainties and contingencies include, but are not limited to: uncertainties relating to changes in general economic and real estate conditions; uncertainties relating to the implementation of our real estate investment strategy; uncertainties relating to financing availability and capital proceeds; uncertainties relating to the closing of property acquisitions; uncertainties related to the timing and availability of distributions; and other risk factors as outlined in SSGT's annual report. This is neither an offer nor a solicitation to purchase securities.




 Contacts 


 Julie Leber 
 Damon Elder                       


 Spotlight Marketing Communications 
 Spotlight Marketing Communications 


 949.427.5172 ext. 703 
 949.427.5172, ext. 702 


 julie@spotlightmarcom.com 
 damon@spotlightmarcom.com  




 
View original content with multimedia:http://www.prnewswire.com/news-releases/strategic-storage-growth-trust-inc-acquires-newly-constructed-self-storage-facility-near-charleston-south-carolina-300490847.html
SOURCE Strategic Storage Growth Trust, Inc.



 


















May 24, 2017, 15:40 ET
Preview: Strategic Storage Growth Trust, Inc. Acquires 510-Unit Newly Constructed Self Storage Facility in Sarasota, Florida








My News


  Release contains wide tables.	  View fullscreen.






 Also from this source




 











May 24, 2017, 15:40 ET
                                  				                                                                                     
                              Strategic Storage Growth Trust, Inc. Acquires 510-Unit Newly...








 











May 18, 2017, 14:16 ET
                                  				                                                                                     
                              Strategic Storage Growth Trust, Inc. Reports 2017 First Quarter...





 Explore
 More news releases in similar topics

  Banking & Financial Services
  Real Estate
Acquisitions, Mergers and Takeovers








 You just read:
Strategic Storage Growth Trust, Inc. Acquires Newly-Constructed Self Storage Facility Near Charleston, South Carolina


 News provided by
Strategic Storage Growth Trust, Inc.  
Jul 19, 2017, 12:54 ET








 Share this article









































 











Looking to send a news release with PR Newswire?
Take advantage of the world's leading distribution platform.
Sign up to get started
Request more information
Have an account? Log In

















Search











Searching for your content...









Advanced Search












































 




Strategic Storage Growth Trust, Inc.: Private Company Information - Bloomberg









































  





















































































July 28, 2017 6:01 PM ET
Capital Markets

Company Overview of Strategic Storage Growth Trust, Inc.



Snapshot People




Company Overview
Strategic Storage Growth Trust, Inc. was formerly known as Strategic Storage Opportunity Trust, Inc. and changed its name to Strategic Storage Growth Trust, Inc. in December 2013. Strategic Storage Growth Trust, Inc. was incorporated in 2013 and is based in Ladera Ranch, California.


111 Corporate DriveSuite 120Ladera Ranch, CA 92694United StatesFounded in 2013



Phone: 877-327-3485

Fax: 949-429-6606

www.strategicreit.com







Key Executives for Strategic Storage Growth Trust, Inc.




Mr. H. Michael Schwartz


      	Chairman, Chief Executive Officer and President
      


Age: 48
        







Mr. Michael S. McClure


      	Chief Financial Officer, Principal Accounting Officer, Executive Vice President and Treasurer
      


Age: 54
        







Ms. Paula Mathews


      	Executive Vice President and Secretary
      


Age: 65
        







Mr. Wayne Johnson


      	Senior Vice President of Acquisitions
      


Age: 59
        







Mr. Kenneth H. Morrison


      	Senior Vice President of Property Management
      


Age: 50
        




Compensation as of Fiscal Year 2017. 

Strategic Storage Growth Trust, Inc. Key Developments

Strategic Storage Growth Trust, Inc. Announces Purchase of 500-Unit Newly-Constructed Self Storage Facility in the Charleston, South Carolina
Jul 19 17
Strategic Storage Growth Trust, Inc. announced that it has purchased of a 500-unit, newly-constructed self storage facility in the Charleston, South Carolina suburb of Mount Pleasant for $5.7 million. This modern self storage facility is 100% climate controlled and easily accessible to renters via Interstate 526 and other heavily trafficked thoroughfares. The property presents an opportunity to add significant value to the portfolio of Strategic Storage Growth Trust as their professional management team leases up the facility, which is currently approximately 16% leased. This acquisition fits their investment strategy, which is to acquire attractive value-add opportunities. Located at 701 Wando Park Blvd., the three-story structure is situated on approximately 1.5 acres of land and includes roughly 48,000 rentable square feet. With this latest acquisition, the portfolio of the company is now comprised of more than 12,900 self storage units in 9 states.


Strategic Storage Growth Trust, Inc. Announces Unaudited Consolidated Financial Results for the Quarter Ended March 31, 2017
May 18 17
Strategic Storage Growth Trust, Inc. announced unaudited consolidated financial results for the quarter ended March 31, 2017. For the period, on consolidated basis the company reported total revenues of $2,704,431 against $2,072,885 a year ago. Operating loss was $915,044 against $906,365 a year ago. Net loss was $1,091,592 against $1,520,001 a year ago. Net loss attributable to company common stockholders was $1,090,197 against $2,021,593 a year ago. Net loss per Class T and A share basic and diluted was $0.08 against $0.63 a year ago. Negative FFO was $223,214 compared to $1,136,145 a year ago. MFFO was $487,651 compared to negative MFFO of $764,901 a year ago. Increased same-store revenues and NOI by 20.1% and 38.9%, respectively, compared to the same period in 2016.


Strategic Storage Growth Trust Mulls Investments
May 5 17
Strategic Storage Growth Trust, Inc. is seeking investments. Strategic Storage Growth Trust has filed a shelf registration in the amount of approximately $120 million. Strategic Storage Growth Trust, said, “We expect that the proceeds raised pursuant to the offering will be used to repurchase shares of our common stock under our share redemption program, unless terminated. The remaining proceeds will be used for general corporate purposes, including, but not limited to, investments in self storage facilities and related self storage real estate investments and payment of real estate-related acquisition fees and acquisition expenses.”


Similar Private Companies By Industry



Company Name
Region



 @Visory LLC United States 1 Road Partners LLC United States 11T Partners, LLC United States 123Jump.com, Inc. United States 1509225 Ontario, Inc. United States




Recent Private Companies Transactions



TypeDate
Target





Merger/Acquisition

			      July 19, 2017
			    
500 Unit, Self Storage Facility in Charleston, South Carolina Suburb of Mount Pleasant



Merger/Acquisition

			      May 24, 2017
			    
510 Unit Self Storage Facility in Sarasota, Florida



Merger/Acquisition

			      March 15, 2017
			    
114,000 Net Rentable Square Feet of Two Self Storage Facilities Located in Asheville





Request Profile Update

















 












The information and data displayed in this profile are created and managed by S&P Global Market Intelligence, a division of S&P Global. Bloomberg.com does not create or control the content. For inquiries, please contact S&P Global Market Intelligence directly by clicking 
	here.




Stock Quotes


Market data is delayed at least 15 minutes.







Company Lookup



Most Searched Private Companies



Company Name
Geographic Region



 Lawyers Committee for Civil Rights Under Law United States NYC2012, Inc. United States The Advertising Council, Inc. United States Bertelsmann AG Europe Rush University United States













Sponsored Financial Commentaries

Sponsored Links






Browse Companies
A
B
C
D
E
F
G
H
I
J
K
L
M
N
O
P
Q
R
S
T
U
V
W
X
Y
Z
 | 
0
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9






Request Profile Update

						Only a company representative may request an update for the company profile. Documentation will be required.
					  
To contact Strategic Storage Growth Trust, Inc., please visit www.strategicreit.com.  Company data is provided by S&P Global Market Intelligence.  Please use this form to report any data issues.
					  


Information Missing - Please enter your information in the following field(s): 




Company Name

Your Name*

Your E-Mail Address*

Your Phone Number*

Type of Data*


Overview
Executives
Key developments
Similar companies
Transactions


Update Needed*

All data changes require verification from public sources.  Please include the correct value or values and a source where we can verify.


Cancel


Submit






Your requested update has been submitted
Our data partners will research the update request and update the information on this page if necessary. Research and follow-up could take several weeks. If you have questions, you can contact them at bwwebmaster@businessweek.com.


Close




























Strategic Storage Growth Trust Inc: Company Profile - Bloomberg



































































  









Feedback























strategic storage growth trust inc
Private Company









Company Profile
Sector: Financials
Industry: Real Estate
Sub-Industry: REIT
Strategic Storage Growth Trust, Inc. operates as a real estate investment trust. The Company focuses on development, redevelopment, and lease up of self storage properties.




Corporate Information
Address:

111 Corporate Drive
Suite 120
Ladera Ranch, CA 92694
United States


Phone:
-


Fax:
-


Web url:
www.strategicreit.com























From The Web












Sponsored Financial Commentaries







More From The Web


















Home


News


Top Headlines
Most Popular
Exclusive
Law
Entrepreneurs
Leaders
Economy
Environment
Science
Sports
Markets Magazine
Pursuits Magazine
Bloomberg Visual Data
Bloomberg Best (and Worst)
For comments or complaints about news coverage click here


Regions
U.S.
China
Europe
Asia
U.K. & Ireland
Australia & New Zealand
Canada
India & Pakistan
Japan
Africa
Eastern Europe
Latin America
Middle East
Markets
Commodities
Currencies
Bonds
Stocks
Energy Markets
Municipal Bonds
Emerging Markets
Funds
Islamic Finance
Industries
Energy
Technology
Real Estate
Finance
Health Care
Transportation
Insurance
Retail
Media
Manufacturing




Quick


Market Data


Stocks
Stock Futures
World Indexes
Americas
Europe, Middle East, & Africa
Asia-Pacific
Gainers & Losers
Earnings Calendar
Industry Leaders
Currencies
Americas
Europe, Middle East, & Africa
Asia-Pacific
Foreign Exchange Cross Rates
FX Fixings
Currency Converter
Forex Trading Videos
Commodities
Energy Prices
Metals Prices
Agricultural Prices


Rates & Bonds
US Treasuries
UK Gilts
Germany Bunds
Japan Bonds
Australia Bonds
Bloomberg Bond Indexes
Corporate Bonds
Consumer Rates
Economic Calendar
Watchlist
European Debt Crisis
Symbol Search
The Market Now




Personal Finance


Top Headlines
Saving & Investing
Real Estate
Retirement Planning
Financial Advisers
Taxes
Blog: Ventured & Gained
Real Cost Of
Money Gallery
Calculators
Watchlist (Portfolio Tracker)




Tech


Top Headlines
Social Media
Mobile & Wireless
Web
Enterprise Tech
TV, Games & Movies
Apple
Tech Deals
Global Tech
Slideshows
Videos




U.S. Politics


Sustainability


Top Headlines
Energy
Corporate Sustainability
Policy
Natural Resources
Health & Population
Slideshows
Videos
Blog: The Grid




Luxury


Top Headlines
Autos
Billionaires
Living
Property
Travel
Well Spent
Loot Blog
Pursuits Magazine
Videos




TV


Live TV
Channel Finder
Personalities
Apple TV
iPad App
Schedule
U.S.
Asia
Europe


Shows
Surveillance
Market Makers
Lunch Money
Street Smart
Bloomberg West
Game Changers




Video


Must See
Latest
Live TV
Shows
Playlist




Radio


Live Radio
Shows
Schedule
Personalities
Podcasts
Bloomberg Brief
Featured Podcasts and New Shows
Bloomberg View
Masters in Business
First Word
Surveillance
Bloomberg Advantage
In the Loop
Bloomberg Law
Taking Stock
Bloomberg Best
More Podcasts




Blogs


Global Tech
The Grid
Loot
The Market Now
Political Capital
Tech Deals
Ventured and Gained




Opinion




My Saved



Registration



Sign In



Bloomberg.com



Businessweek.com



Company



About
Blog
Careers
Diversity & Inclusion
News Mission
Philanthropy & Engagement
Press Room
Procurement
Sustainability




Products



Financial Products
Bloomberg Professional Service
Bloomberg Anywhere
Bloomberg Tradebook
Bloomberg Briefs
Bloomberg Indexes
Bloomberg SEF
Service Center
Customer Support
Enterprise Products
Enterprise Solutions
Trading Solutions
Industry Products
Bloomberg BNA
Bloomberg Government
Bloomberg Law
Bloomberg Link
Bloomberg New Energy Finance
Bloomberg Sports
Content Licensing




Bloomberg Anywhere



Mobile Apps



Bloomberg Visual Data



































Contract and Agreement Category List











































Home
Search
Sign-In/Up
Contracts
Dictionary
Clauses
Companies
People

About
FAQ
Blog







Sample Contract Categories 

a

b

c

d

e

f

g

h

i

j

k

l

m

n

o

p

q

r

s

t

u

v

w

x

y

z


abcdefghijklmnopqrstuvwxyz


337k
		Delaware
	

277k
		New York
	

113k
		California
	

70k
		Texas
	

68k
		Agreement
	

62k
		Nevada
	

46k
		Florida
	

44k
		Maryland
	

40k
		Illinois
	

38k
		Employment Agreement
	

38k
		Washington
	

37k
		Amended And Restated
	

36k
		Massachusetts
	

34k
		New Jersey
	

33k
		Pennsylvania
	

28k
		Georgia
	

28k
		Colorado
	

26k
		Ohio
	

25k
		Minnesota
	

25k
		Virginia
	

21k
		North Carolina
	

20k
		Incentive Plan
	

19k
		Credit Agreement
	

19k
		Amendment
	

16k
		Connecticut
	

16k
		Michigan
	

15k
		Indiana
	

14k
		Registration Rights Agreement
	

14k
		Recitals
	

13k
		Tennessee
	

13k
		Arizona
	

13k
		Missouri
	

12k
		Purchase Agreement
	

12k
		Promissory Note
	

12k
		Indenture
	

11k
		Warrant
	

11k
		Louisiana
	

11k
		Kansas
	

11k
		Utah
	

11k
		Wisconsin
	

10k
		Oklahoma
	

9k
		Securities Purchase Agreement
	

9k
		Agreement And Plan Of Merger
	

8k
		Iowa
	

8k
		Supplemental Indenture
	

8k
		Note
	

8k
		Equity Incentive Plan
	

7k
		Kentucky
	

7k
		Stock Purchase Agreement
	

7k
		Alabama
	














×









      Have an account? Sign in here.

Law Insider
Recover your password







No account? Register Now!


No account? Register Now!
Sign in
by using one of this services











or







Forgot your password?


Have an account? Sign in here.
Join Law Insider
for Free
by using one of this services











or







By registering you agree to our
      terms of service.










Strategic Storage Trust









	Untitled Page
































SSTI Investment Opportunity Use Disclaimer
Use of this website is subject to its Terms and Conditions and our Privacy Policy. This material must be read in conjunction with the Strategic Storage Trust, Inc prospectus in order to understand all risks of any offering of securities to which this website relates. An investment in Strategic Storage Trust, Inc. is subject to significant risks. A more detailed description of the risks associated with this offering is found in the section of the prospectus entitled “Risk Factors.” A summary of the risks can be found on the website. Investors should read and understand all of the risk factors before making a decision to invest in shares of our common stock.
If you agree to the Terms and Conditions and Privacy Policy of this website, click Accept.









You are exiting the Strategic Storage Trust, Inc. website to connect to another website which is not controlled, maintained or reviewed by Strategic Storage Trust, Inc.  The website is controlled by our sponsor, Strategic Capital Holdings, LLC.  We do not endorse or adopt any of the information contained thereon. By clicking on the "Accept" button below, you acknowledge that no guarantees are made by Strategic Storage Trust, Inc. as to the accuracy, completeness or timeliness of the information contained on the third-party website.













Home|Request Information|Investors|Financial Advisors|Press Room|Contact Us



About SSTILetter To Potential ShareholdersExecutive Officers & DirectorsPress RoomGovernance DocumentsSEC FilingsXBRL Interactive DataCorporate Organizational ActionsExtra Space / SmartStop MergerSelf Storage IndustryKey FactsIndustry ProfileDemand DriversDemographic TrendsREIT OverviewProperty GalleryDocuments








REIT OVERVIEW



Documents
SSTI publications and forms may be downloaded by clicking on the file name. Use Adobe Acrobat Reader to read the files:
Annual Reports/Proxy Statement
2014 Proxy Statement» 2013 Annual Report» 2012 Annual Report»2011 Annual Report»2010 Annual Report» 2009 Annual Report» 2008 Annual Report» 
Forms
Request eDelivery Form» Representative Change Form»Custodian Change Form»Address Change Form»Distribution Change Form»Transfer on Death Form»First Retirement Kit»Transfer and Assignment of Shares Form» 

Select Capital Wholesaler Map
Wholesaler Map»
Property Gallery
Daphne, Alabama»Montgomery, Alabama»Mesa, Arizona»Phoenix, Arizona»Phoenix, Arizona(II)»Tempe, Arizona» Gilroy, California»La Cienega Blvd, California»Ladera Ranch, California»Lake
 Forest, California»Long Beach, California»Morgan Hill, California»San Lorenzo, California»Vallejo, California»Dufferin, Toronto Canada»95th Street, Illinois»Ogden, Illinois»Roosevelt, Illinois»Western, Illinois»Davie, Florida»Ft.
 Lauderdale, Florida»Gulf Breeze, Florida»Gulf Breeze, Florida(II)»Monument, Florida»Stuart I, Florida»Stuart II, Florida»Tallahassee, Florida»Timuquana, Florida»Weston, Florida»2040 Lawrenceville, Georgia»2044 Lawrenceville, Georgia»3564 Lawrenceville, Georgia»Alpharetta, Georgia»Austell, Georgia»N. Berkeley, Georgia»Breckinridge, Georgia» Buford, Georgia» Ellenwood, Georgia» Jonesboro, Georgia»Kennesaw, Georgia» Marietta, Georgia»  Marietta II, Georgia» Peachtree City, Georgia»Peachtree, Duluth, Georgia»Roswell, Georgia»Savannah I, Georgia»Savannah II, Georgia»Sharpsburg, Georgia»Smyrna, Georgia»West Oak, Georgia»Wilmington Island, Georgia»Crescent Springs, Kentucky»Erlanger, Kentucky»Florence, Kentucky»Florence, Kentucky on Steilen Dr.»Walton, Kentucky»Biloxi, Mississippi»Jersey City, New Jersey»Fort
 Lee, New Jersey»Riverdale,
New Jersey»Toms River, New Jersey»Trenton, New Jersey»Ballston Spa, New York»Downtown, Nevada»Bonanza, Nevada»Las Vegas, Nevada»Las Vegas, Nevada(II)»Pecos, Nevada»Rancho Drive, Nevada»Racetrack, Nevada»West Ann Road, Nevada»Concord, North Carolina»Hickory, North Carolina»Morganton, North Carolina» Collegeville, Pennsylvania»Pittsburgh, Pennsylvania» Skippack Pike, Pennsylvania»West Mifflin, Pennsylvania»Ashley River, South Carolina»Bluffton, South Carolina»Bowman Road, South Carolina»Columbia, South Carolina»Greenville, South Carolina»Lexington I, South Carolina»Lexington II, South Carolina»Myrtle Beach, South Carolina»Savannah Hwy., South Carolina»Memphis, Tennessee»Dallas, Texas»El Paso I, Texas»El Paso II, Texas»El Paso III, Texas»El Paso IV, Texas»El Paso V, Texas»Kemah, Texas»Houston, Texas»Pearland, Texas»Seabrook, Texas»Chantilly, Virginia»Manassas, Virginia» Fredericksburg, Virginia»LaSalle, Virginia»Sandston, Virginia» 












2017 © Strategic Storage Trust, Inc. All Rights Reserved. Select Capital Corporation is a member of FINRA/SIPC.

Privacy Policy|
Terms & Conditions|
Site Map





This website is neither an offer to sell nor the solicitation of an offer to buy any security. Use of this website is subject to its Terms and Conditions and Privacy Policy.















        Strategic Storage Trust

























 
On June 15, 2015 - SmartStop Self Storage, Inc. announced it has entered into a definitive merger agreement under which it will be acquired by Extra Space Storage Inc. (NYSE: EXR). SmartStop stockholders will receive $13.75 per share in cash which represents a total purchase price of $1.4 billion.
 









Home|Request Information|Investors|Financial Advisors|Press Room|Contact Us





About SSTILetter To Potential ShareholdersExecutive Officers & DirectorsPress RoomGovernance DocumentsSEC FilingsXBRL Interactive DataCorporate Organizational ActionsExtra Space / SmartStop MergerSelf Storage IndustryKey FactsIndustry ProfileDemand DriversDemographic TrendsREIT OverviewProperty GalleryDocuments









Income-oriented investors: You now have access to a whole new asset class*
Introducing the first public non-traded REIT focused on the self storage industry, Strategic Storage Trust, Inc. Self storage is an asset class driven by human life factors such as birth, death, marriage, divorce, retirement, relocation, military enlistment, economic expansion and contraction. We believe that SSTI can provide stability, diversification, income and the potential for growth over the long term.
LEARN MORE »









Notice: Strategic Storage Trust, Inc.Closed to New Investors on September 22, 2013.



WE FOCUS ON ACQUISITION, OWNERSHIP, OPERATION & DEVELOPMENT ACROSS AMERICA’S SELF STORAGE INDUSTRY.



 
 
 



New SSTI App Available on Apple, Android and Blackberry Devices 

    <



Press Room

6/15/2015 - SmartStop Self Storage, Inc. To Be Acquired for...6/2/2015 – SmartStop Self Storage Reports First Quarter...4/27/2015 - SmartStop Self Storage Responds to MacKenzie's...


more »


Property State Map

Complete Property Gallery























2017 © Strategic Storage Trust, Inc. All Rights Reserved. Select Capital Corporation is a member of FINRA/SIPC.

Privacy Policy|
Terms & Conditions|
Site Map







 
 
Support the kure! 
 




           *Strategic Storage Trust, Inc. is the first public non-traded REIT in the self storage industry.
       


This website is neither an offer to sell nor the solicitation of an offer to buy any security. Use of this website is subject to its Terms and Conditions and Privacy Policy.













Strategic Storage Trust - Terms and Conditions of Use






	Untitled Page































Home|Request Information|Investors|Financial Advisors|Press Room|Contact Us





About SSTILetter To Potential ShareholdersExecutive Officers & DirectorsPress RoomGovernance DocumentsSEC FilingsXBRL Interactive DataCorporate Organizational ActionsExtra Space / SmartStop MergerSelf Storage IndustryKey FactsIndustry ProfileDemand DriversDemographic TrendsREIT OverviewProperty GalleryDocuments








Terms and Conditions of Use



Use
The SSTI Website and its contents are intended solely for personal use. Unless otherwise explicitly specified, all materials that are included in or are otherwise a part of this SSTI Website are copyrights, patents, trademarks, trade dress and/or other intellectual property owned, controlled or licensed by SSTI or by third parties who have licensed their materials to SSTI and are protected by U.S. and international intellectual property laws. The compilation (i.e., the collection, arrangement and assembly) of all materials on this SSTI Website is the exclusive property of SSTI or its licensors and is protected by U.S. and international copyright laws. Except as solely provided in the next sentence, no material from the SSTI Website may be copied, reproduced, republished, uploaded, posted, transmitted or distributed in any way. You may download one copy of the materials on any single computer for your personal use only, provided that: (a) you keep intact all copyright and other proprietary notices; (b) you do not use the materials in a manner that suggests an association with any of our products, services or brands; and (c) you make no modifications to the materials. In addition, you agree not to: (m) use or access this SSTI Website for any purpose that is unlawful or prohibited by these Terms and Conditions of Use; (n) use or access this SSTI Website in a manner that could damage, disable, overburden, or impair any SSTI server or the networks connected to any SSTI server; (o) interfere with any third party’s use and enjoyment of this SSTI Website; or (p) attempt to gain unauthorized access to accounts, computer systems or networks connected to any SSTI server through hacking, password mining or any other means.
Terms and Termination
SSTI shall have the right to terminate your access to, and use of, the SSTI Website immediately, if, in its sole discretion, SSTI believes that your conduct fails to conform to these Terms and Conditions of Use. SSTI also reserves the right to investigate suspected violations of these Terms and Conditions of Use, including without limitation any violation arising from any submission, posting or emails you make or send to the SSTI Website.
Upon termination of your agreement to be bound by these Terms and Conditions of Use, all rights granted to you under these Terms and Conditions of Use will cease immediately, and you agree that you will: (a) immediately discontinue use of the SSTI Website(s); and (b) as applicable, pay any amounts owed to SSTI in full within thirty (30) days from the date of such termination. 












You are exiting the Strategic Storage Trust, Inc. website to connect to another website which is not controlled, maintained or reviewed by Strategic Storage Trust, Inc.  The website is controlled by our sponsor, Strategic Capital Holdings, LLC.  We do not endorse or adopt any of the information contained thereon. By clicking on the "Accept" button below, you acknowledge that no guarantees are made by Strategic Storage Trust, Inc. as to the accuracy, completeness or timeliness of the information contained on the third-party website.

















2017 © Strategic Storage Trust, Inc. All Rights Reserved. Select Capital Corporation is a member of FINRA/SIPC.

Privacy Policy|
Terms & Conditions|
Site Map




This website is neither an offer to sell nor the solicitation of an offer to buy any security. Use of this website is subject to its Terms and Conditions and Privacy Policy.











Strategic Storage Trust - Self Storage Industry - Demographic Trends









	Untitled Page































Home|Request Information|Investors|Financial Advisors|Press Room|Contact Us



About SSTILetter To Potential ShareholdersExecutive Officers & DirectorsPress RoomGovernance DocumentsSEC FilingsXBRL Interactive DataCorporate Organizational ActionsExtra Space / SmartStop MergerSelf Storage IndustryKey FactsIndustry ProfileDemand DriversDemographic TrendsREIT OverviewProperty GalleryDocuments








Self Storage Industry



Demographic Trends
Baby Boomers
We expect the “baby boomer” generation to have a major impact on the future of the self storage industry. During the 19-year period from 1946 to 1964, approximately 77 million babies, or “baby boomers,” were born in the U.S. According to the U.S. Census Bureau, “baby boomers” make up nearly 27% of the U.S. population.
These “baby boomers” are heading towards retirement age and have accumulated valuable possessions over the years, many of which have sentimental family or historic value, such as pictures, letters and other family keepsakes. As the “baby boomers” move into retirement age and begin to downsize their households, we believe there will be a great need for self storage facilities to assist them in protecting and housing these possessions for prolonged periods of time.
Boomers’ Most Important Personal Possessions(1)



Possessions
All Boomers %


Pictures, photos, paintings
70%


Family keepsakes
28%


Jewelry
16%


Collectibles
14%


Vehicles
8%


Furniture
8%


Sports equipment
4%


Clothing
2%



Boomers’ Likelihood of Moving To New Residence In Retirement(1)

(1)Source: Peter D. Hart Research Associates, Inc, “The Baby Boomer Generation-How their retirement will affect the future of the self storage industry,” Self Storage Association, July 2007





 





You are exiting the Strategic Storage Trust, Inc. website to connect to another website which is not controlled, maintained or reviewed by Strategic Storage Trust, Inc.  The website is controlled by our sponsor, Strategic Capital Holdings, LLC.  We do not endorse or adopt any of the information contained thereon. By clicking on the "Accept" button below, you acknowledge that no guarantees are made by Strategic Storage Trust, Inc. as to the accuracy, completeness or timeliness of the information contained on the third-party website.
















2017 © Strategic Storage Trust, Inc. All Rights Reserved. Select Capital Corporation is a member of FINRA/SIPC.

Privacy Policy|
Terms & Conditions|
Site Map





This website is neither an offer to sell nor the solicitation of an offer to buy any security. Use of this website is subject to its Terms and Conditions and Privacy Policy.














Strategic Storage Trust - About SSTI








	Untitled Page































Home|Request Information|Investors|Financial Advisors|Press Room|Contact Us





About SSTILetter To Potential ShareholdersExecutive Officers & DirectorsPress RoomGovernance DocumentsSEC FilingsXBRL Interactive DataCorporate Organizational ActionsExtra Space / SmartStop MergerSelf Storage IndustryKey FactsIndustry ProfileDemand DriversDemographic TrendsREIT OverviewProperty GalleryDocuments









About SSTI



About SSTI
Strategic Storage Trust, Inc. is the fifth public self storage company in the United States and the first self storage REIT in the public non-traded REIT marketplace. The self storage industry is a unique asset class which displays recession-resistant traits as it is affected by human life factors such as marriage, divorce, retirement, relocation, and military enlistment. This, combined with a fragmented industry and baby boomer demographics, makes for an attractive real estate asset class in the coming years.
The Strategic Storage Trust, Inc. management team is comprised of industry veterans. They have institutional experience in the underwriting and acquisitions of self storage properties. Collectively, our team has over 50 years of self storage experience and has completed over $10 billion in real estate transactions. 












You are exiting the Strategic Storage Trust, Inc. website to connect to another website which is not controlled, maintained or reviewed by Strategic Storage Trust, Inc.  The website is controlled by our sponsor, Strategic Capital Holdings, LLC.  We do not endorse or adopt any of the information contained thereon. By clicking on the "Accept" button below, you acknowledge that no guarantees are made by Strategic Storage Trust, Inc. as to the accuracy, completeness or timeliness of the information contained on the third-party website.




















2017 © Strategic Storage Trust, Inc. All Rights Reserved. Select Capital Corporation is a member of FINRA/SIPC.

Privacy Policy|
Terms & Conditions|
Site Map




This website is neither an offer to sell nor the solicitation of an offer to buy any security. Use of this website is subject to its Terms and Conditions and Privacy Policy.
















Strategic Storage Trust - About SST - Letter to Potential Shareholders








	Untitled Page































Home|Request Information|Investors|Financial Advisors|Press Room|Contact Us





About SSTILetter To Potential ShareholdersExecutive Officers & DirectorsPress RoomGovernance DocumentsSEC FilingsXBRL Interactive DataCorporate Organizational ActionsExtra Space / SmartStop MergerSelf Storage IndustryKey FactsIndustry ProfileDemand DriversDemographic TrendsREIT OverviewProperty GalleryDocuments









About SSTI



TO OUR POTENTIAL STOCKHOLDERS:
Did you know that nearly one out of every ten U.S. households rents a self storage
unit? (1) The self storage industry has been the fastest growing sector of the U.S. commercial real estate industry over the last 35 years. (1) 
That is why we’ve developed Strategic Storage Trust, Inc. (SSTI). SSTI focuses on the acquisition, operation and development of self storage properties across the United States. We may also invest in other storage related properties such as storage facilities for automobiles, recreational vehicles, and boats. We believe that the retirement of the baby boomers and a fragmented market are just a few of the factors that will provide further economic growth in this industry. Self storage is also an asset class that has recession resistant traits.
We believe that Strategic Storage Trust, Inc. can provide stability, diversification, potential growth and income over the long term. Thank you for considering SSTI for your portfolio. We look forward to serving you.
Continued successes,
H. Michael Schwartz
Chairman and CEO
 
(1) Self Storage Association "Industry Fact Sheet" (6/11). Although self storage is the fastest–growing sector in U.S. commercial real estate, there is no guarantee that SSTI will experience similar growth.












You are exiting the Strategic Storage Trust, Inc. website to connect to another website which is not controlled, maintained or reviewed by Strategic Storage Trust, Inc.  The website is controlled by our sponsor, Strategic Capital Holdings, LLC.  We do not endorse or adopt any of the information contained thereon. By clicking on the "Accept" button below, you acknowledge that no guarantees are made by Strategic Storage Trust, Inc. as to the accuracy, completeness or timeliness of the information contained on the third-party website.




















2017 © Strategic Storage Trust, Inc. All Rights Reserved. Select Capital Corporation is a member of FINRA/SIPC.

Privacy Policy|
Terms & Conditions|
Site Map




This website is neither an offer to sell nor the solicitation of an offer to buy any security. Use of this website is subject to its Terms and Conditions and Privacy Policy.



































 



 Strategic Storage Growth Trust, Inc. Acquires Newly-Constructed Self Storage Facility Near 
         










    










 













 











 



















Strategic Storage Growth Trust, Inc. Acquires Newly-Constructed Self Storage Facility Near Charleston, South Carolina
        																																						
              
















 News provided by
Strategic Storage Growth Trust, Inc.  
Jul 19, 2017, 12:54 ET









 Share this article




























































CHARLESTON, S.C., July 19, 2017 /PRNewswire/ -- Strategic Storage Growth Trust, Inc. ("SSGT"), a public non-traded real estate investment trust sponsored by SmartStop Asset Management, LLC, announced today its purchase of a 500-unit, newly-constructed self storage facility in the Charleston, South Carolina suburb of Mount Pleasant for $5.7 million. 








"This modern self storage facility is 100 percent climate controlled and easily accessible to renters via Interstate 526 and other heavily trafficked thoroughfares," said H. Michael Schwartz, chairman and chief executive officer. "The property presents an opportunity to add significant value to the portfolio of Strategic Storage Growth Trust as our professional management team leases up the facility, which is currently approximately 16 percent leased. This acquisition fits our investment strategy, which is to acquire attractive value-add opportunities."
Located at 701 Wando Park Blvd., the three-story structure is situated on approximately 1.5 acres of land and includes roughly 48,000 rentable square feet.
With this latest acquisition, the portfolio of SSGT is now comprised of more than 12,900 self storage units in 9 states.
About Strategic Storage Growth Trust, Inc. (SSGT)SSGT is a public non-traded REIT that focuses on the acquisition, development, redevelopment and lease-up of self storage properties. The SSGT portfolio currently consists of 20 operating self storage facilities located in nine states comprising approximately 12,900 self storage units and approximately 1.5 million net rentable square feet of storage space. Additionally, SSGT owns two development properties in the Greater Toronto Area which will be comprised of approximately 1,700 self storage units and 170,000 net rentable square feet of storage space once completed, and one development property in Asheville, North Carolina which will be comprised of approximately 650 self storage units and 72,000 net rentable square feet of storage space once completed.
About SmartStop Asset Management, LLC (SmartStop)SmartStop is a diversified real estate company focused on self storage assets, along with student and senior housing. SmartStop has a managed portfolio that currently includes more than 68,000 self storage units and 7.9 million net rentable square feet and approximately $1.3 billion of real estate assets under management. SmartStop is the asset manager for 109 self storage facilities located throughout the United States and Toronto, Canada and two student housing facilities. SmartStop is the sponsor of Strategic Storage Trust II, Inc., SSGT and Strategic Storage Trust IV, Inc., all public non-traded REITs focusing on self storage assets. The facilities offer affordable and accessible storage units for residential and commercial customers. In addition, they offer secure interior and exterior storage units as well as outside storage areas for vehicles, RVs and boats. Additional information is available at www.smartstopassetmanagement.com.
This press release may contain certain forward-looking statements within the meaning of Section 27A of the Securities Act of 1933, as amended, and Section 21E of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as amended. Such forward-looking statements can generally be identified by our use of forward-looking terminology such as "may," "will," "expect," "intend," "anticipate," "estimate," "believe," "continue," or other similar words. Because such statements include risks, uncertainties and contingencies, actual results may differ materially from the expectations, intentions, beliefs, plans or predictions of the future expressed or implied by such forward-looking statements. These risks, uncertainties and contingencies include, but are not limited to: uncertainties relating to changes in general economic and real estate conditions; uncertainties relating to the implementation of our real estate investment strategy; uncertainties relating to financing availability and capital proceeds; uncertainties relating to the closing of property acquisitions; uncertainties related to the timing and availability of distributions; and other risk factors as outlined in SSGT's annual report. This is neither an offer nor a solicitation to purchase securities.




 Contacts 


 Julie Leber 
 Damon Elder                       


 Spotlight Marketing Communications 
 Spotlight Marketing Communications 


 949.427.5172 ext. 703 
 949.427.5172, ext. 702 


 julie@spotlightmarcom.com 
 damon@spotlightmarcom.com  




 
View original content with multimedia:http://www.prnewswire.com/news-releases/strategic-storage-growth-trust-inc-acquires-newly-constructed-self-storage-facility-near-charleston-south-carolina-300490847.html
SOURCE Strategic Storage Growth Trust, Inc.



 


















May 24, 2017, 15:40 ET
Preview: Strategic Storage Growth Trust, Inc. Acquires 510-Unit Newly Constructed Self Storage Facility in Sarasota, Florida








My News


  Release contains wide tables.	  View fullscreen.






 Also from this source




 











May 24, 2017, 15:40 ET
                                  				                                                                                     
                              Strategic Storage Growth Trust, Inc. Acquires 510-Unit Newly...








 











May 18, 2017, 14:16 ET
                                  				                                                                                     
                              Strategic Storage Growth Trust, Inc. Reports 2017 First Quarter...





 Explore
 More news releases in similar topics

  Banking & Financial Services
  Real Estate
Acquisitions, Mergers and Takeovers








 You just read:
Strategic Storage Growth Trust, Inc. Acquires Newly-Constructed Self Storage Facility Near Charleston, South Carolina


 News provided by
Strategic Storage Growth Trust, Inc.  
Jul 19, 2017, 12:54 ET








 Share this article









































 











Looking to send a news release with PR Newswire?
Take advantage of the world's leading distribution platform.
Sign up to get started
Request more information
Have an account? Log In

















Search











Searching for your content...









Advanced Search












































 























 



 Strategic Storage Growth Trust, Inc. Reports 2016 Fourth Quarter and Year-End Results 
         










    










 













 











 



















Strategic Storage Growth Trust, Inc. Reports 2016 Fourth Quarter and Year-End Results
        																																
              











 News provided by
Strategic Storage Growth Trust, Inc.  
Mar 29, 2017, 14:33 ET









 Share this article




























































LADERA RANCH, Calif., March 29, 2017 /PRNewswire/ -- Strategic Storage Growth Trust, Inc. ("SSGT") announced strong increases in same-store revenues, net operating income ("NOI"), occupancy and annualized rent per square footage as part of its overall operating results for the three and twelve months ended December 31, 2016. 








"We are pleased to report continued revenue and NOI growth for our same-store year-over-year comparisons in both the fourth quarter and fiscal year 2016," said H. Michael Schwartz, chairman and chief executive officer of SSGT. "Additionally, our new certificate of occupancy self storage facility in Phoenix, Arizona, which was acquired in May of 2016, continues to outperform our expectations, finishing the year at 63% occupancy."
Fourth Quarter 2016 Highlights 

Increased same-store revenues and NOI by 24.1% and 77.6%, respectively, compared to the same period in 2015. 
Increased same-store average physical occupancy by approximately 8.4% to 88.9% from 80.5% compared to the same period in 2015. 
Increased same-store annualized rent per occupied square foot by approximately 15.1% to $11.34 from $9.85 compared to the same period in 2015.

Year-to-Date Highlights 

Increased same-store revenues and NOI by 20.9% and 44.7%, respectively, compared to the same period in 2015. 
Increased same-store average physical occupancy by approximately 10.5% to 89.8% from 79.3% compared to the same period in 2015. 
Increased same-store annualized rent per occupied square foot by approximately 7.3% to $9.60 from $8.95 compared to the same period in 2015.

Completed Acquisitions Subsequent to Year End:
Elk Grove PropertyOn January 13, 2017, we completed the acquisition of a self storage facility located in Elk Grove Village, Illinois for a purchase price of approximately $10.1 million, plus closing costs and acquisition fees, which was funded by a combination of a draw under the KeyBank Facility, and the remainder with net proceeds from our offering. 
Garden Grove PropertyOn March 16, 2017, we closed on a self storage facility located in Garden Grove, California for a purchase price of approximately $18.4 million, plus closing costs and acquisition fees, which was funded with net proceeds from our offering. 
Potential Acquisitions:
Sarasota PropertyOn March 1, 2017, we entered into an assignment with our sponsor in which our sponsor assigned us a purchase and sale agreement with an unaffiliated third party for the acquisition of property that is being developed into a self storage facility located in Sarasota, Florida (the "Sarasota Property"). The purchase price for the Sarasota Property is approximately $6.7 million, plus closing costs and acquisition fees, and includes an earnout provision of up to $0.7 million that is dependent upon the property exceeding certain performance hurdles in its third year of operations. We expect the acquisition of the Sarasota Property to close in the first or second quarter of 2017 after construction is complete on the self storage facility and a certificate of occupancy has been issued. 
Asheville PortfolioOn March 2, 2017, one of our subsidiaries executed a purchase and sale agreement with an unaffiliated third party for the acquisition of two existing self storage facilities in Asheville, North Carolina (the "Asheville Portfolio"). The purchase price for the Asheville Portfolio is approximately $11.0 million, plus closing costs and acquisition fees. The acquisition of the Asheville Portfolio is expected to close in the second quarter of 2017. 
Capital Transactions:
KeyBank Facility PayoffAs of December 31, 2016, the outstanding principal balance under the KeyBank Facility was approximately $7.6 million. Subsequent to December 31, 2016, we borrowed additional amounts and made additional payments on the KeyBank Facility ultimately bringing our outstanding balance to zero.
Quarterly Dividend: 
On March 14, 2017, our board of directors declared a daily distribution in the amount of $0.0010958904 per share on outstanding shares of common stock, payable to both Class A and Class T stockholders of record of such shares shown on our books as of the close of business each day during the period commencing April 1, 2017 and ending June 30, 2017. The distribution to Class T stockholders will be reduced by a stockholder servicing fee. Such distributions payable to each stockholder of record during the month will be paid the following month. 







 STRATEGIC STORAGE GROWTH TRUST, INC. AND SUBSIDIARIES  CONSOLIDATED BALANCE SHEETS  






 December 31, 




 2016 
 2015 



 ASSETS 





 Real estate facilities: 





 Land 
 $ 24,315,650 
 $ 13,180,000 



 Buildings 
 57,722,965 
 42,338,012 



 Site improvements 
 5,542,989 
 4,811,387 




 87,581,604 
 60,329,399 



 Accumulated depreciation 
 (3,300,523 ) 
 (1,157,113 ) 




 84,281,081 
 59,172,286 



 Construction in process 
 2,174,191 
 30,808 



 Real estate facilities, net 
 86,455,272 
 59,203,094 



 Cash and cash equivalents 
 3,642,631 
 6,600,046 



 Other assets, net 
 3,156,769 
 1,871,423 



 Debt issuance costs, net 
 292,160 
 801,005 



 Intangible assets, net 
 391,143 
 1,454,140 









 Total assets 
 $ 93,937,975 
 $ 69,929,708 









 LIABILITIES AND EQUITY 





 Secured debt, net 
 $ 12,509,308 
 $ 38,300,000 



 Accounts payable and accrued liabilities 
 1,499,984 
 1,028,660 



 Due to affiliates 
 963,535 
 252,997 



 Distributions payable 
 305,764 
 20,700 



 Distributions payable to preferred unitholders in our Operating Partnership 
 — 
 1,042,394 









 Total liabilities 
 15,278,591 
 40,644,751 









 Commitments and contingencies 





 Redeemable common stock 
 1,086,603 
 10,706 



 Preferred equity in our Operating Partnership 
 — 
 15,884,852 









 Equity: 





 Strategic Storage Growth Trust, Inc. equity: 





 Preferred Stock, $0.001 par value; 200,000,000 shares authorized; none issued and outstanding at December 31, 2016 and 2015 
 — 
 — 



 Class A Common stock, $0.001 par value; 350,000,000 shares authorized; 8,607,246 and 2,676,239 shares issued and outstanding at December 31, 2016 and 2015, respectively 
 8,607 
 2,676 



 Class T Common stock, $0.001 par value; 350,000,000 shares authorized; 1,716,957 and 18,086 issued and outstanding at December 31, 2016 and 2015, respectively 
 1,717 
 18 



 Additional paid-in capital 
 92,442,198 
 20,735,425 



 Distributions 
 (2,010,167 ) 
 (37,073 ) 



 Accumulated deficit 
 (12,655,490 ) 
 (7,283,029 ) 



 Accumulated other comprehensive loss 
 (153,079 ) 
 — 



 Total Strategic Storage Growth Trust, Inc. equity 
 77,633,786 
 13,418,017 



 Noncontrolling interests in our Operating Partnership 
 (61,005 ) 
 (28,618 ) 



 Total equity 
 77,572,781 
 13,389,399 



 Total liabilities and equity 
 $93,937,975 
 $ 69,929,708 


















 STRATEGIC STORAGE GROWTH TRUST, INC. AND SUBSIDIARIES  CONSOLIDATED STATEMENTS OF OPERATIONS  






 2016 
 2015 
 2014 


 Revenues: 





 Self storage rental revenue 
 $  9,240,486 
 $  4,708,208 
 $      641,036 


 Ancillary operating revenue 
 73,273 
 149,199 
 24,099 








 Total revenues 
 9,313,759 
 4,857,407 
 665,135 








 Operating expenses: 





 Property operating expenses 
 4,016,072 
 2,205,173 
 287,724 


 Property operating expenses – affiliates 
 982,736 
 558,250 
 104,394 


 General and administrative 
 1,865,419 
 1,224,892 
 463,234 


 Depreciation 
 2,169,600 
 1,161,013 
 183,604 


 Intangible amortization expense 
 1,128,959 
 946,146 
 254,715 


 Acquisition expense - affiliates 
 753,090 
 822,798 
 488,660 


 Other property acquisition expenses 
 255,834 
 289,824 
 102,742 








 Total operating expenses 
 11,171,710 
 7,208,096 
 1,885,073 








 Operating loss 
 (1,857,951 ) 
 (2,350,689 ) 
 (1,219,938 ) 


 Other income (expense): 





 Interest expense 
 (1,420,961 ) 
 (651,479 ) 
 (153,638 ) 


 Interest expense – debt issuance costs 
 (636,467 ) 
 (375,319 ) 
 (65,433 ) 


 Other 
 (39,995 ) 
 1,766 
 3,374 








 Net loss 
 (3,955,374 ) 
 (3,375,721 ) 
 (1,435,635 ) 


 Less: Distributions to preferred unitholders in our Operating Partnership 
 (1,365,704 ) 
 (1,893,841 ) 
 (422,282 ) 


 Less: Accretion of preferred equity costs 
 (76,724 ) 
 (296,548 ) 
 (88,304 ) 


 Net loss attributable to the noncontrolling interests in our Operating Partnership 
 25,341 
 100,338 
 128,964 








 Net loss attributable to Strategic Storage Growth Trust, Inc. common stockholders 
 $ (5,372,461 ) 
 $ (5,465,772 ) 
 $  (1,817,257 ) 








 Net loss per Class A share—basic and diluted 
 $         (0.99) 
 $           (4.59 ) 
 $            (7.31 ) 


 Net loss per Class T share—basic and diluted 
 $         (0.99) 
 $           (4.59 ) 
 $               — 








 Weighted average Class A shares outstanding—basic and diluted 
 5,003,663 
 1,190,486 
 248,565 


 Weighted average Class T shares outstanding—basic and diluted 
 442,316 
 1,250 
 — 










ADDITIONAL INFORMATION REGARDING NOI
Net Operating Income ("NOI") 
NOI is a non-GAAP measure that we define as net income (loss), computed in accordance with GAAP, generated from properties before corporate general and administrative expenses, asset management fees, interest expense, depreciation, amortization, acquisition expenses and other non-property related expenses. We believe that NOI is useful for investors as it provides a measure of the operating performance of our operating assets because NOI excludes certain items that are not associated with the operation of the properties. Additionally, we believe that NOI is a widely accepted measure of comparative operating performance in the real estate community. However, our use of the term NOI may not be comparable to that of other real estate companies as they may have different methodologies for computing this amount. 
About Strategic Storage Growth Trust, Inc. ("SSGT"): 
SSGT is a public non-traded REIT that focuses on the acquisition, development, redevelopment and lease-up of self storage properties. The SSGT portfolio currently consists of 16 operating self storage facilities located in seven states comprising approximately 11,000 self storage units and approximately 1.3 million net rentable square feet of storage space. Additionally, SSGT owns two development properties in the Greater Toronto Area which will be comprised of approximately 1,700 self storage units and 170,000 net rental square feet of storage space once completed, and one development property in Asheville, North Carolina which will be comprised of approximately 650 self storage units and 72,000 net rental square feet of storage space once completed.
About SmartStop Asset Management, LLC ("SmartStop"):
SmartStop is a diversified real estate company focused on self storage assets, along with student and senior housing. The company has a managed portfolio that currently includes more than 66,000 self storage units and approximately 7.7 million rentable square feet and approximately $1 billion of real estate assets under management. The company is the asset manager for 104 self storage facilities located throughout the United States and Toronto, Canada and one student housing facility. SmartStop is the sponsor of Strategic Storage Trust II, Inc., SSGT and Strategic Storage Trust IV, Inc., all public non-traded REITs focusing on self storage assets. The facilities offer affordable and accessible storage units for residential and commercial customers. In addition, they offer secure interior and exterior storage units as well as outside storage areas for vehicles, RVs and boats. Additional information is available at www.smartstopassetmanagement.com. 
This press release may contain certain forward-looking statements within the meaning of Section 27A of the Securities Act of 1933, as amended, and Section 21E of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as amended. Such forward-looking statements can generally be identified by our use of forward-looking terminology such as "may," "will," "expect," "intend," "anticipate," "estimate," "believe," "continue," or other similar words. Because such statements include risks, uncertainties and contingencies, actual results may differ materially from the expectations, intentions, beliefs, plans or predictions of the future expressed or implied by such forward-looking statements. These risks, uncertainties and contingencies include, but are not limited to: uncertainties relating to changes in general economic and real estate conditions; uncertainties relating to the implementation of our real estate investment strategy; uncertainties relating to financing availability and capital proceeds; uncertainties relating to the closing of property acquisitions; uncertainties related to the timing and availability of distributions; and other risk factors as outlined in the Company's public filings with the Securities and Exchange Commission. This is neither an offer nor a solicitation to purchase securities. 
To view the original version on PR Newswire, visit:http://www.prnewswire.com/news-releases/strategic-storage-growth-trust-inc-reports-2016-fourth-quarter-and-year-end-results-300431312.html
SOURCE Strategic Storage Growth Trust, Inc.
 Related Links

http://www.smartstopassetmanagement.com



 

















Apr 17, 2017, 17:56 ET
Preview: Strategic Storage Growth Trust, Inc. Announces Estimated Per Share Value of $11.56















Mar 22, 2017, 14:16 ET
Preview: Strategic Storage Growth Trust, Inc. Acquires Newly Converted Self Storage Facility in Garden Grove, Calif.






My News


  Release contains wide tables.	  View fullscreen.






 Also from this source




 











Jul 19, 2017, 12:54 ET
                                  				                                                                                     
                              Strategic Storage Growth Trust, Inc. Acquires Newly-Constructed...








 











May 24, 2017, 15:40 ET
                                  				                                                                                     
                              Strategic Storage Growth Trust, Inc. Acquires 510-Unit Newly...





 Explore
 More news releases in similar topics

  Banking & Financial Services
  Real Estate
  Commercial Real Estate
Earnings Forecasts & Projections
Earnings








 You just read:
Strategic Storage Growth Trust, Inc. Reports 2016 Fourth Quarter and Year-End Results


 News provided by
Strategic Storage Growth Trust, Inc.  
Mar 29, 2017, 14:33 ET








 Share this article









































 











Looking to send a news release with PR Newswire?
Take advantage of the world's leading distribution platform.
Sign up to get started
Request more information
Have an account? Log In

















Search











Searching for your content...









Advanced Search












































 





Microsoft personalized ad preferences




 













To opt out of personalized ads in this browser, your browser history must allow first-party and third-party cookies and you must have your browsing experience set to NOT delete browsing history on exit. Instructions for enabling cookies and configuring your browsing history may be available in your browsers settings, privacy, or help documentation.

















Sign in
















  Hold on… We’re sorry but this didn’t work.                  You can’t turn off personalized ads right now because your browser is currently blocking third-party cookies. We can help you fix this issue.                Let’s get started:  Depending on what browser you use, open Options or Settings.                  Make sure that third-party cookies are not blocked anymore. To find out how, search your browser’s Help.                                 Revisit http://choice.microsoft.com/opt-out, and then on the “Personalized ads in this browser” tile, click Off.                 ext74081 




  About Our Ads To create a more customized online experience, some of the ads you may receive on Microsoft websites and apps are tailored to your previous activities, searches and site visits. You're in control and here's where you can make the advertising choice that's right for you. ext74075 




  Where Can I Learn More about Advertising on Microsoft Websites and Apps? Microsoft partners with Oath, AppNexus and other third party service providers to help present customized content and display advertisements on MSN, Outlook.com and other websites and apps. Microsoft also delivers search ads to Bing and our search syndication partners. Learn more about Microsoft’s privacy practices here. You can learn more about interest-based ads from Oath and AppNexus in their privacy statements: Oath and AppNexus. What Choices Do I Have About Interest-Based Advertising? On this page, you can opt out of receiving interest based advertising from Microsoft. You can also opt out of receiving interest-based advertising from all self-regulatory members, including Microsoft, Oath, AppNexus and other third party ad networks, at the following sites:  In the US: Digital Advertising Alliance (DAA) In Europe: European Interactive Digital Advertising Alliance (EDAA) In Canada: Ad Choices: Digital Advertising Alliance of Canada (DAAC)  You can control interest-based advertising in Windows apps by turning off the advertising ID in Windows Settings.  More choices  Do you want personalized ads from other companies?  Questions? If you have a privacy question or a question for the Chief Privacy Officer of Microsoft, please contact us by using our web form. We will respond to questions within 30 days. ext74076 




       Personalized ads in this browser     OFF    Opt-out is currently unavailable, please try again later.  Control the "personalized ads" setting for this web browser.  Learn more           If you want Microsoft to show ads that might be relevant to you, click On. To show “generic” ads, click Off.          ext74078 




       Personalized ads wherever I use my Microsoft account     OFF   Sign in to change...    Opt-out is currently unavailable, please try again later.  Control the "personalized ads" setting that applies when you are signed in on any computer or device with your Microsoft account, including Windows, Windows phone, Xbox and other devices.  Learn more                    If you want Microsoft to show ads that might be relevant to you, click On. To show “generic” ads, click Off.         If you choose “generic” ads and use a browser, your choice applies to everyone when using that browser as long as you do not clear your cookies.          ext74079 




       Personalized ads in Windows         In your Windows Settings, you can turn off personalized ads that appear in apps on this device. You’ll still see ads, but they won’t be personalized anymore.     If you have Windows 8.1:            Access the charms by touching or moving your pointer to the right edge of the screen.                 Click or tap Settings, and then click or tap Change PC Settings.                 Click or tap Privacy, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.          If you have Windows 10:            Click or tap the Start button.                 Click or tap Settings.                 Click or tap Privacy, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.          If you have a Windows mobile device:            Go to Settings.                 Tap on Privacy.                 Tap on Advertising ID, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.                If you want to turn off personalized ads from Microsoft wherever you use your Microsoft account including apps on Windows, Windows Phone, Xbox and other devices, you can do so by selecting the Microsoft account option above.    ext74080 














Legal
Privacy & Cookies
© 2017 Microsoft









Strategic Storage Growth Trust, Inc. Acquires Newly-Constructed Self Storage Facility Near Charleston, South CarolinaHomeMailFlickrTumblrNewsSportsFinanceCelebrityAnswersGroupsMobileMoreTry Yahoo Finance on Firefox »YahooSearchSearchSign inU.S. Markets closedS&P 5002,472.10-3.32 (-0.13%)Dow 3021,830.31+33.76 (+0.15%)Nasdaq6,374.68-7.51 (-0.12%)LISTENWho is the face of pro baseball?Yahoo Finance's Dan Roberts and Myles Udland debate the business of baseballStrategic Storage Growth Trust, Inc. Acquires Newly-Constructed Self Storage Facility Near Charleston, South CarolinaPR NewswireJuly 19, 2017ReblogShareTweetShareCHARLESTON, S.C., July 19, 2017 /PRNewswire/ -- Strategic Storage Growth Trust, Inc. ("SSGT"), a public non-traded real estate investment trust sponsored by SmartStop Asset Management, LLC, announced today its purchase of a 500-unit, newly-constructed self storage facility in the Charleston, South Carolina suburb of Mount Pleasant for $5.7 million.Strategic Storage Growth Trust, Inc. (PRNewsfoto/Strategic Storage Growth Trust)More"This modern self storage facility is 100 percent climate controlled and easily accessible to renters via Interstate 526 and other heavily trafficked thoroughfares," said H. Michael Schwartz, chairman and chief executive officer. "The property presents an opportunity to add significant value to the portfolio of Strategic Storage Growth Trust as our professional management team leases up the facility, which is currently approximately 16 percent leased. This acquisition fits our investment strategy, which is to acquire attractive value-add opportunities."Located at 701 Wando Park Blvd., the three-story structure is situated on approximately 1.5 acres of land and includes roughly 48,000 rentable square feet.With this latest acquisition, the portfolio of SSGT is now comprised of more than 12,900 self storage units in 9 states.About Strategic Storage Growth Trust, Inc. (SSGT)SSGT is a public non-traded REIT that focuses on the acquisition, development, redevelopment and lease-up of self storage properties. The SSGT portfolio currently consists of 20 operating self storage facilities located in nine states comprising approximately 12,900 self storage units and approximately 1.5 million net rentable square feet of storage space. Additionally, SSGT owns two development properties in the Greater Toronto Area which will be comprised of approximately 1,700 self storage units and 170,000 net rentable square feet of storage space once completed, and one development property in Asheville, North Carolina which will be comprised of approximately 650 self storage units and 72,000 net rentable square feet of storage space once completed.About SmartStop Asset Management, LLC (SmartStop)SmartStop is a diversified real estate company focused on self storage assets, along with student and senior housing. SmartStop has a managed portfolio that currently includes more than 68,000 self storage units and 7.9 million net rentable square feet and approximately $1.3 billion of real estate assets under management. SmartStop is the asset manager for 109 self storage facilities located throughout the United States and Toronto, Canada and two student housing facilities. SmartStop is the sponsor of Strategic Storage Trust II, Inc., SSGT and Strategic Storage Trust IV, Inc., all public non-traded REITs focusing on self storage assets. The facilities offer affordable and accessible storage units for residential and commercial customers. In addition, they offer secure interior and exterior storage units as well as outside storage areas for vehicles, RVs and boats. Additional information is available at www.smartstopassetmanagement.com.This press release may contain certain forward-looking statements within the meaning of Section 27A of the Securities Act of 1933, as amended, and Section 21E of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as amended. Such forward-looking statements can generally be identified by our use of forward-looking terminology such as "may," "will," "expect," "intend," "anticipate," "estimate," "believe," "continue," or other similar words. Because such statements include risks, uncertainties and contingencies, actual results may differ materially from the expectations, intentions, beliefs, plans or predictions of the future expressed or implied by such forward-looking statements. These risks, uncertainties and contingencies include, but are not limited to: uncertainties relating to changes in general economic and real estate conditions; uncertainties relating to the implementation of our real estate investment strategy; uncertainties relating to financing availability and capital proceeds; uncertainties relating to the closing of property acquisitions; uncertainties related to the timing and availability of distributions; and other risk factors as outlined in SSGT's annual report. This is neither an offer nor a solicitation to purchase securities.Read More  Contacts     Julie Leber   Damon Elder                           Spotlight Marketing Communications   Spotlight Marketing Communications     949.427.5172 ext. 703   949.427.5172, ext. 702     julie@spotlightmarcom.com   damon@spotlightmarcom.com    View original content with multimedia:http://www.prnewswire.com/news-releases/strategic-storage-growth-trust-inc-acquires-newly-constructed-self-storage-facility-near-charleston-south-carolina-300490847.htmlReblogShareTweetShareRecently ViewedYour list is empty.What to Read NextTrump names John Kelly new chief of staff; Reince Priebus outCNBCFive Social Security myths debunkedFidelity Brokerage Services LLCSponsoredThe 'two pizza rule' is a secret to productive meetings that helped Amazon CEO Jeff Bezos become one of the world's richest menBusiness InsiderThe real reason overseas manufacturing is coming to AmericaYahoo FinanceChevron and Exxon Mobil have a tough path ahead: NYSE traderYahoo Finance VideoThis Will Be In Everyone's Household By 2020Banyan HillSponsoredStocks mixed after heavy earnings weekNorth Korea 2nd ICBM test puts much of US in range: expertsAssociated PressTax cuts just got more likelyYahoo FinanceEngineer Finds Pattern; Makes Millions in StocksMoney MorningSponsoredAPNewsBreak: Yellowstone park cracks down on sex harassmentAssociated PressMy bullish view on stocks hasn't changed one iota: NYSE traderYahoo Finance VideoBlue Apron: Bullish calls not all they're cooked up to beYahoo FinanceZuckerberg Wife's Ambitious Secret Finally ExposedUNewz.MeSponsoredHere are the US targets North Korea most likely wants to nukeBusiness InsiderJohn McCain: Here's why I voted no and killed the 'skinny repeal'Business InsiderDonald Trump Tweet-Rages After John McCain Kills Obamacare Skinny RepealStan: Let trump rage.  McCain you did the right thing.Join the Conversation1 / 51.3k








Strategic Storage Growth Trust, Inc. Reports 2017 First Quarter ResultsHomeMailFlickrTumblrNewsSportsFinanceCelebrityAnswersGroupsMobileMoreTry Yahoo Finance on Firefox »YahooSearchSearchSign inU.S. Markets closedS&P 5002,472.10-3.32 (-0.13%)Dow 3021,830.31+33.76 (+0.15%)Nasdaq6,374.68-7.51 (-0.12%)LISTENWho is the face of pro baseball?Yahoo Finance's Dan Roberts and Myles Udland debate the business of baseballStrategic Storage Growth Trust, Inc. Reports 2017 First Quarter ResultsPR NewswireMay 18, 2017ReblogShareTweetShareLADERA RANCH, Calif., May 18, 2017 /PRNewswire/ -- Strategic Storage Growth Trust, Inc. ("SSGT") announced strong increases in same-store revenues, net operating income ("NOI"), occupancy and annualized rent per occupied square footage as part of its overall operating results for the three months ended March 31, 2017.Strategic Storage Growth Trust, Inc. (PRNewsfoto/Strategic Storage Growth Trust)More"Our strong performance during the first quarter demonstrates the execution of our strategy: acquiring quality assets with good lease-up potential and delivering growth through institutional management," said H. Michael Schwartz, chairman and chief executive officer of SSGT. "We also continued to expand our portfolio during the quarter with the acquisition of two lease-up properties in growing markets totaling $28.5 million."First Quarter 2017 HighlightsIncreased same-store revenues and NOI by 20.1% and 38.9%, respectively, compared to the same period in 2016.Increased same-store average physical occupancy by approximately 9.1% to 93.2% from 84.1% compared to the same period in 2016.Increased same-store annualized rent per occupied square foot by approximately 8.1% to $11.51 from $10.65 compared to the same period in 2016.Acquisitions Elk Grove PropertyOn January 13, 2017, SSGT closed on a self storage facility located in Elk Grove Village, IL. SSGT acquired the Elk Grove property for a purchase price of approximately $10.1 million. The property has approximately 800 units and 82,000 rentable square feet.Garden Grove PropertyOn March 16, 2017, SSGT closed on a newly-converted self storage facility located in Garden Grove, CA. SSGT acquired the Garden Grove property for a purchase price of approximately $18.4 million. The property has approximately 960 units and 95,000 rentable square feet.Closedown of OfferingThe closedown of SSGT's primary offering occurred on March 31, 2017.  Investors who submitted subscriptions in accordance with SSGT's close down procedures and were accepted by SSGT were admitted as stockholders effective as of March 31, 2017. As of May 15, 2017, SSGT had issued approximately 18.7 million Class A Shares and approximately 7.5 million Class T Shares for approximately $200.9 million and $79.0 million, respectively, in its offerings.Quarterly DistributionOn March 14, 2017, SSGT's board of directors declared a daily distribution in the amount of $0.0010958904 per share on outstanding shares of common stock, payable to both Class A and Class T stockholders of record of such shares shown on its books as of the close of business each day during the period commencing April 1, 2017 and ending June 30, 2017. Such distributions payable to each stockholder of record during the month will be paid the following month.Subsequent EventsUpdated NAVOn April 13, 2017, the board of directors of SSGT, upon recommendation of its nominating and corporate governance committee, approved an estimated value per share of its common stock of $11.56 for its Class A Shares and Class T Shares based on the estimated value of SSGT's assets less the estimated value of its liabilities, or net asset value, divided by the number of shares outstanding on a fully diluted basis, calculated as of December 31, 2016. See SSGT's Current Report on Form 8-K filed with the SEC on April 17, 2017 for a description of the methodologies and assumptions used to determine, and the limitations of, the estimated value per share.DRP OfferingOn May 5, 2017, SSGT filed with the SEC a Registration Statement on Form S-3, which incorporated its distribution reinvestment plan (the "DRP Offering") and registered up to an additional $115.6 million in shares under its DRP Offering. The DRP Offering may be terminated at any time upon 10 days' prior written notice to stockholders.Read MoreAsheville PortfolioOn May 11, 2017, SSGT closed on two existing self storage facilities in Asheville, North Carolina for a purchase price of approximately $10.3 million. The properties combined have approximately 850 units and 115,000 rentable square feet.Potential Acquisitions:Riggs Road PropertyOn April 5, 2017, a subsidiary of SSGT executed a purchase and sale agreement with an unaffiliated third party for the acquisition of property that is being developed into a self storage facility located in Gilbert, AZ (the "Riggs Road Property"). The purchase price for the Riggs Road Property is approximately $10.0 million. SSGT expects the acquisition of the Riggs Road Property to close in the second or third quarter of 2018 after construction is complete on the self storage facility and a certificate of occupancy has been issued.Wando Park PropertyOn May 9, 2017, SSGT entered into an assignment with its sponsor in which its sponsor assigned it a purchase and sale agreement with an unaffiliated third party for the acquisition of a self storage facility located in Mt. Pleasant, SC (the "Wando Park Property"). The purchase price for the Wando Park Property is approximately $5.7 million. The purchase price includes a provision for an additional purchase price payment of up to approximately $0.5 million that could become due based upon the property exceeding certain performance hurdles in its third year of operations. SSGT expects the acquisition of the Wando Park Property to close in the second or third quarter of 2017.Deer Springs PropertyOn May 9, 2017, SSGT entered into an assignment with its sponsor in which its sponsor assigned it a purchase and sale agreement with an unaffiliated third party for the acquisition of property that is being developed into a self storage facility located in Las Vegas, NV (the "Deer Springs Property"). The purchase price for the Deer Springs Property is approximately $9.2 million. SSGT expects the acquisition of the Deer Springs Property to close in the first or second quarter of 2018 after construction is complete on the self storage facility and a certificate of occupancy has been issued.  STRATEGIC STORAGE GROWTH TRUST, INC. AND SUBSIDIARIES     CONSOLIDATED BALANCE SHEETS            March 31, 2017 (Unaudited)    December 31, 2016     ASSETS        Real estate facilities:        Land   $  30,108,291    $  24,315,650     Buildings   80,681,282    57,722,965     Site improvements   5,583,269    5,542,989      116,372,842    87,581,604     Accumulated depreciation   (3,970,128 )    (3,300,523 )      112,402,714    84,281,081     Construction in process   2,839,546    2,174,191     Real estate facilities, net   115,242,260    86,455,272     Cash and cash equivalents   85,027,632    3,642,631     Other assets, net   8,023,979    3,156,769     Debt issuance costs, net   155,254    292,160     Intangible assets, net   197,555    391,143           Total assets   $ 208,646,680    $  93,937,975           LIABILITIES AND EQUITY        Secured debt, net   $    4,854,773    $  12,509,308     Accounts payable and accrued liabilities   1,627,650    1,499,984     Due to affiliates   3,613,033    963,535     Distributions payable   566,058    305,764           Total liabilities   10,661,514    15,278,591           Commitments and contingencies        Redeemable common stock   1,650,898    1,086,603           Equity:        Strategic Storage Growth Trust, Inc. equity:        Preferred Stock, $0.001 par value; 200,000,000 shares authorized; none issued and outstanding at March 31, 2017 and December 31, 2016   —    —     Class A Common stock, $0.001 par value; 350,000,000 shares authorized; 16,678,676 and 8,607,246 shares issued and outstanding at March 31, 2017 and December 31, 2016, respectively   16,678    8,607     Class T Common stock, $0.001 par value; 350,000,000 shares authorized; 5,992,046 and 1,716,957 issued and outstanding at March 31, 2017 and December 31, 2016, respectively   5,992    1,717     Additional paid-in capital   213,538,960    92,442,198     Distributions   (3,310,630 )    (2,010,167 )     Accumulated deficit   (13,745,687 )    (12,655,490 )     Accumulated other comprehensive income   (106,662)    (153,079 )     Total Strategic Storage Growth Trust, Inc. equity   196,398,651    77,633,786     Noncontrolling interests in our Operating Partnership   (64,383)    (61,005 )     Total equity   196,334,268    77,572,781     Total liabilities and equity   $ 208,646,680    $  93,937,975     STRATEGIC STORAGE GROWTH TRUST, INC. AND SUBSIDIARIES     CONSOLIDATED STATEMENTS OF OPERATIONS     (Unaudited)           Three Months Ended March 31,      2017    2016     Revenues:        Self storage rental revenue   $ 2,686,487    $ 2,055,181     Ancillary operating revenue   17,944    17,704     Total revenues   2,704,431    2,072,885           Operating expenses:        Property operating expenses   1,149,496    909,932     Property operating expenses – affiliates   299,327    218,826     General and administrative   581,134    581,881     Depreciation   679,105    502,495     Intangible amortization expense   198,588    392,319     Acquisition expense – affiliates   609,019    305,911     Other property acquisition expenses   102,806    67,886     Total operating expenses   3,619,475    2,979,250           Operating loss   (915,044 )    (906,365 )     Other income (expenses):        Interest expense   (15,100 )    (440,268 )     Interest expense – debt issuance costs   (148,239 )    (173,597 )     Other   (13,209)    229           Net loss   (1,091,592 )    (1,520,001 )     Less: Distributions to preferred unitholders in our Operating Partnership   —    (484,055 )     Less: Accretion of preferred equity costs   —    (29,967 )     Net loss attributable to the noncontrolling interests in our Operating Partnership   1,395    12,430           Net loss attributable to Strategic Storage Growth Trust, Inc. common stockholders   $ (1,090,197 )    $ (2,021,593 )           Net loss per Class A share—basic and diluted   $          (0.08 )    $          (0.63 )     Net loss per Class T share—basic and diluted   $          (0.08 )    $          (0.63 )           Weighted average Class A shares outstanding—basic and diluted   10,981,585    3,168,283     Weighted average Class T shares outstanding—basic and diluted   2,948,658    49,849           STRATEGIC STORAGE GROWTH TRUST, INC. AND SUBSIDIARIES     NON-GAAP MEASURE – COMPUTATION OF FUNDS FROM OPERATIONS     (Unaudited)            Three MonthsEndedMarch 31,2017    Three MonthsEndedMarch 31,2016     Net loss attributable to Strategic Storage Growth Trust, Inc. common stockholders(1)   $ (1,090,197)    $ (2,021,593)     Add:        Depreciation   669,605    498,376     Amortization of intangible assets   198,588    392,319     Deduct:        Adjustment for noncontrolling interests   (1,210)    (5,247)     FFO   (223,214)    (1,136,145)     Other Adjustments:        Acquisition expenses(2)   711,825    373,797     Adjustment for noncontrolling interests   (960)    (2,553)     MFFO   $     487,651    $(764,901)  SSGT's results of operations for the three months ended March 31, 2017 and 2016 have been significantly impacted by a favorable increase in same store results of approximately $0.3 million, a decrease in interest expense of approximately $0.4 million, and a decrease in distributions to preferred interest holders of approximately $0.5 million.  (1)   Net loss attributable to SSGT's common stockholders for the three months ended March 31, 2017 and 2016 included none and approximately $0.5 million, respectively, in distributions to preferred unitholders in SSGT's operating partnership and none and approximately $30,000, respectively, in accretion of preferred equity costs. As of December 31, 2016, SSGT had redeemed all of the preferred units.         (2)   In evaluating investments in real estate, SSGT differentiates the costs to acquire the investment from the operations derived from the investment. Such information would be comparable only for publicly registered, non-traded REITs that have generally completed their acquisition activity and have other similar operating characteristics. By excluding expensed acquisition related expenses, SSGT believes MFFO provides useful supplemental information that is comparable for each type of real estate investment and is consistent with management's analysis of the investing and operating performance of its properties. Acquisition fees and expenses include payments to SSGT's advisor and third parties. Acquisition related expenses under GAAP are considered operating expenses and as expenses included in the determination of net income (loss) and income (loss) from continuing operations, both of which are performance measures under GAAP. All paid and accrued acquisition fees and expenses will have negative effects on returns to investors, the potential for future distributions, and cash flows generated by SSGT, unless earnings from operations or net sales proceeds from the disposition of other properties are generated to cover the purchase price of the property, these fees and expenses and other costs related to such property.          Non-cash Items Included in Net Loss:          Provided below is additional information related to selected non-cash items included in net loss above, which may be helpful in assessing SSGT's operating results:        •   Debt issuance costs of approximately $148,000 and $174,000, respectively, were recognized for the three months ended March 31, 2017 and 2016.  ADDITIONAL INFORMATION REGARDING NOI, FFO, and MFFONet Operating Income ("NOI")NOI is a non-GAAP measure that SSGT defines as net income (loss), computed in accordance with GAAP, generated from properties before corporate general and administrative expenses, asset management fees, interest expense, depreciation, amortization, acquisition expenses and other non-property related expenses. SSGT believes that NOI is useful for investors as it provides a measure of the operating performance of its operating assets because NOI excludes certain items that are not associated with the operation of the properties. Additionally, SSGT believes that NOI is a widely accepted measure of comparative operating performance in the real estate community. However, SSGT's use of the term NOI may not be comparable to that of other real estate companies as they may have different methodologies for computing this amount.Funds from Operations ("FFO") and Modified Funds from Operations ("MFFO")Due to certain unique operating characteristics of real estate companies, the National Association of Real Estate Investment Trusts, or NAREIT, an industry trade group, has promulgated a measure known as funds from operations, or FFO, which SSGT believes to be an appropriate supplemental measure to reflect the operating performance of a REIT. The use of FFO is recommended by the REIT industry as a supplemental performance measure. FFO is not equivalent to SSGT's net income (loss) as determined under GAAP.SSGT defines FFO, a non-GAAP measure, consistent with the standards established by the White Paper on FFO approved by the Board of Governors of NAREIT, as revised in February 2004, or the White Paper. The White Paper defines FFO as net income (loss) computed in accordance with GAAP, excluding gains or losses from sales of property and asset impairment write downs, plus depreciation and amortization, and after adjustments for unconsolidated partnerships and joint ventures. Adjustments for unconsolidated partnerships and joint ventures are calculated to reflect FFO on the same basis. SSGT's FFO calculation complies with NAREIT's policy described above.The historical accounting convention used for real estate assets requires straight-line depreciation of buildings and improvements, which implies that the value of real estate assets diminishes predictably over time. Diminution in value may occur if such assets are not adequately maintained or repaired and renovated as required by relevant circumstances or other measures necessary to maintain the assets are not undertaken. However, SSGT believes that, since real estate values historically rise and fall with market conditions, including inflation, interest rates, the business cycle, unemployment and consumer spending, presentations of operating results for a REIT using historical accounting for depreciation may be less informative. In addition, in the determination of FFO, SSGT believes it is appropriate to disregard impairment charges, as this is a fair value adjustment that is largely based on market fluctuations and assessments regarding general market conditions which can change over time. An asset will only be evaluated for impairment if certain impairment indications exist and if the carrying value, or book value, exceeds the total estimated undiscounted future cash flows (including net rental revenues, net proceeds on the sale of the property, and any other ancillary cash flows at a property or group level under GAAP) from such asset. Testing for impairment is a continuous process and is analyzed on a quarterly basis. Investors should note, however, that determinations of whether impairment charges have been incurred are based partly on anticipated operating performance, because estimated undiscounted future cash flows from a property, including estimated future net rental revenues, net proceeds on the sale of the property, and certain other ancillary cash flows, are taken into account in determining whether an impairment charge has been incurred. While impairment charges are excluded from the calculation of FFO as described above, investors are cautioned that due to the fact that impairments are based on estimated future undiscounted cash flows and that SSGT intends to have a relatively limited term of its operations; it could be difficult to recover any impairment charges through the eventual sale of the property. To date, SSGT has not recognized any impairments.Historical accounting for real estate involves the use of GAAP. Any other method of accounting for real estate such as the fair value method cannot be construed to be any more accurate or relevant than the comparable methodologies of real estate valuation found in GAAP. Nevertheless, SSGT believes that the use of FFO, which excludes the impact of real estate related depreciation and amortization and impairments, assists in providing a more complete understanding of its performance to investors and to its management, and when compared year over year, reflects the impact on SSGT's operations from trends in occupancy rates, rental rates, operating costs, general and administrative expenses, and interest costs, which may not be immediately apparent from net income (loss).However, FFO or modified funds from operations ("MFFO"), discussed below, should not be construed to be more relevant or accurate than the current GAAP methodology in calculating net income (loss) or in its applicability in evaluating SSGT's operating performance. The method utilized to evaluate the value and performance of real estate under GAAP should be considered a more relevant measure of operational performance and is, therefore, given more prominence than the non-GAAP FFO and MFFO measures and the adjustments to GAAP in calculating FFO and MFFO.Changes in the accounting and reporting rules under GAAP that were put into effect and other changes to GAAP accounting for real estate subsequent to the establishment of NAREIT's definition of FFO have prompted an increase in cash-settled expenses, specifically acquisition fees and expenses, that are expensed as operating expenses under GAAP. SSGT believes these fees and expenses do not affect its overall long-term operating performance. Publicly registered, non-traded REITs typically have a significant amount of acquisition activity and are substantially more dynamic during their initial years of investment and operation. The purchase of properties, and the corresponding expenses associated with that process, is a key feature of SSGT's business plan in order to generate operational income and cash flow in order to make distributions to investors. While other start-up entities may also experience significant acquisition activity during their initial years, SSGT believes that publicly registered, non-traded REITs are unique in that they typically have a limited life with targeted exit strategies within a relatively limited time frame after the acquisition activity ceases. As disclosed in the prospectus for SSGT's offering, SSGT will use the proceeds raised in its offering to acquire properties and SSGT expects to begin the process of achieving a liquidity event (i.e., listing of its shares of common stock on a national securities exchange, a merger or sale, the sale of all or substantially all of its assets, or another similar transaction) within three to five years after the completion of its offering, which is generally comparable to other publicly registered, non-traded REITs. Thus, SSGT does not intend to continuously purchase assets and intends to have a limited life. The decision whether to engage in any liquidity event is in the sole discretion of the board of directors of SSGT. Due to the above factors and other unique features of publicly registered, non-traded REITs, the Investment Program Association, or the IPA, an industry trade group, has standardized a measure known as MFFO, which the IPA has recommended as a supplemental measure for publicly registered, non-traded REITs and which SSGT believes to be another appropriate supplemental measure to reflect the operating performance of a publicly registered, non-traded REIT having the characteristics described above. MFFO is not equivalent to SSGT's net income (loss) as determined under GAAP, and MFFO may not be a useful measure of the impact of long-term operating performance on value if SSGT does not ultimately engage in a liquidity event. SSGT believes that, because MFFO excludes acquisition fees and expenses that affect its operations only in periods in which properties are acquired and that SSGT considers more reflective of investing activities, as well as other non-operating items included in FFO, MFFO can provide, on a going-forward basis, an indication of the sustainability (that is, the capacity to continue to be maintained) of SSGT's operating performance after the period in which it is acquiring properties and once its portfolio is in place. By providing MFFO, SSGT believes it is presenting useful information that assists investors and analysts to better assess the sustainability of its operating performance after its offering has been completed and its properties have been acquired. SSGT also believes that MFFO is a recognized measure of sustainable operating performance by the publicly registered, non-traded REIT industry. Further, SSGT believes MFFO is useful in comparing the sustainability of its operating performance after its offering and acquisitions are completed with the sustainability of the operating performance of other real estate companies that are not as involved in acquisition activities. Investors are cautioned that MFFO should only be used to assess the sustainability of SSGT's operating performance after its offering has been completed and properties have been acquired, as it excludes acquisition fees and expenses that have a negative effect on SSGT's operating performance during the periods in which properties are acquired.SSGT defines MFFO, a non-GAAP measure, consistent with the IPA's Guideline 2010-01, Supplemental Performance Measure for Publicly Registered, Non-Listed REITs: Modified Funds From Operations (the "Practice Guideline") issued by the IPA in November 2010. The Practice Guideline defines MFFO as FFO further adjusted for the following items included in the determination of GAAP net income (loss): acquisition fees and expenses; amounts relating to straight line rents and amortization of above or below intangible lease assets and liabilities; accretion of discounts and amortization of premiums on debt investments; non-recurring impairments of real estate related investments; mark-to-market adjustments included in net income; non-recurring gains or losses included in net income from the extinguishment or sale of debt, hedges, foreign exchange, derivatives or securities holdings where trading of such holdings is not a fundamental attribute of the business plan, unrealized gains or losses resulting from consolidation from, or deconsolidation to, equity accounting, adjustments relating to contingent purchase price obligations included in net income, and after adjustments for consolidated and unconsolidated partnerships and joint ventures, with such adjustments calculated to reflect MFFO on the same basis. The accretion of discounts and amortization of premiums on debt investments, unrealized gains and losses on hedges, foreign exchange, derivatives or securities holdings, unrealized gains and losses resulting from consolidations, as well as other listed cash flow adjustments are adjustments made to net income (loss) in calculating cash flows from operations and, in some cases, reflect gains or losses which are unrealized and may not ultimately be realized.SSGT's MFFO calculation complies with the IPA's Practice Guideline described above. In calculating MFFO, SSGT excludes acquisition related expenses. The other adjustments included in the IPA's Practice Guideline are not applicable to SSGT for the periods presented. Acquisition fees and expenses are paid in cash by SSGT, and it has not set aside or put into escrow any specific amount of proceeds from its offering to be used to fund acquisition fees and expenses. SSGT does not intend to fund acquisition fees and expenses in the future from operating revenues and cash flows, nor from the sale of properties and subsequent re-deployment of capital and concurrent incurring of acquisition fees and expenses. Acquisition fees and expenses include payments to SSGT's advisor and third parties. Acquisition related expenses under GAAP are considered operating expenses and as expenses included in the determination of net income (loss) and income (loss) from continuing operations, both of which are performance measures under GAAP. All paid and accrued acquisition fees and expenses will have negative effects on returns to investors, the potential for future distributions, and cash flows generated by SSGT, unless earnings from operations or net sales proceeds from the disposition of other properties are generated to cover the purchase price of the property, these fees and expenses and other costs related to such property. In the future, if SSGT is not able to raise additional proceeds from its offering, this could result in SSGT paying acquisition fees or reimbursing acquisition expenses due to its advisor, or a portion thereof, with net proceeds from borrowed funds, operational earnings or cash flows, net proceeds from the sale of properties, or ancillary cash flows. As a result, the amount of proceeds available for investment and operations would be reduced, or SSGT may incur additional interest expense as a result of borrowed funds.Further, under GAAP, certain contemplated non-cash fair value and other non-cash adjustments are considered operating non-cash adjustments to net income (loss) in determining cash flows from operations. In addition, SSGT views fair value adjustments of derivatives and the amortization of fair value adjustments related to debt as items which are unrealized and may not ultimately be realized or as items which are not reflective of on-going operations and are therefore typically adjusted for when assessing operating performance.SSGT uses MFFO and the adjustments used to calculate it in order to evaluate its performance against other publicly registered, non-traded REITs which intend to have limited lives with short and defined acquisition periods and targeted exit strategies shortly thereafter. As noted above, MFFO may not be a useful measure of the impact of long-term operating performance if SSGT does not continue to operate in this manner. SSGT believes that its use of MFFO and the adjustments used to calculate it allow it to present its performance in a manner that reflects certain characteristics that are unique to publicly registered, non-traded REITs, such as their limited life, limited and defined acquisition period and targeted exit strategy, and hence that the use of such measures may be useful to investors. For example, acquisition fees and expenses are intended to be funded from the proceeds of SSGT's offering and other financing sources and not from operations. By excluding expensed acquisition fees and expenses, the use of MFFO provides information consistent with management's analysis of the operating performance of the properties. Additionally, fair value adjustments, which are based on the impact of current market fluctuations and underlying assessments of general market conditions, but can also result from operational factors such as rental and occupancy rates, may not be directly related or attributable to SSGT's current operating performance. By excluding such charges that may reflect anticipated and unrealized gains or losses, SSGT believes MFFO provides useful supplemental information.Presentation of this information is intended to provide useful information to investors as they compare the operating performance of different REITs, although it should be noted that not all REITs calculate FFO and MFFO the same way, so comparisons with other REITs may not be meaningful. Furthermore, FFO and MFFO are not necessarily indicative of cash flow available to fund cash needs and should not be considered as an alternative to net income (loss) or income (loss) from continuing operations as an indication of SSGT's performance, as an alternative to cash flows from operations, which is an indication of SSGT's liquidity, or indicative of funds available to fund SSGT's cash needs including its ability to make distributions to its stockholders. FFO and MFFO should be reviewed in conjunction with other measurements as an indication of SSGT's performance. MFFO may be useful in assisting management and investors in assessing the sustainability of operating performance in future operating periods, and in particular, after the offering and acquisition stages are complete. Neither the SEC, NAREIT, nor any other regulatory body has passed judgment on the acceptability of the adjustments that SSGT uses to calculate FFO or MFFO. In the future, the SEC, NAREIT or another regulatory body may decide to standardize the allowable adjustments across the publicly registered, non-traded REIT industry and SSGT would have to adjust its calculation and characterization of FFO or MFFO.About Strategic Storage Growth Trust, Inc. ("SSGT"):SSGT is a public non-traded REIT that focuses on the acquisition, development, redevelopment and lease-up of self storage properties. The SSGT portfolio currently consists of 18 operating self storage facilities located in eight states comprising approximately 11,900 self storage units and approximately 1.4 million net rentable square feet of storage space. Additionally, SSGT owns two development properties in the Greater Toronto Area which will be comprised of approximately 1,700 self storage units and 170,000 net rental square feet of storage space once completed, and one development property in Asheville, North Carolina which will be comprised of approximately 650 self storage units and 72,000 net rental square feet of storage space once completed.About SmartStop Asset Management, LLC ("SmartStop"):SmartStop is a diversified real estate company focused on self storage assets, along with student and senior housing. SmartStop has a managed portfolio that currently includes more than 67,000 self storage units and approximately 7.8 million rentable square feet and approximately $1 billion of real estate assets under management. SmartStop is the asset manager for 107 self storage facilities located throughout the United States and Toronto, Canada and one student housing facility. SmartStop is the sponsor of Strategic Storage Trust II, Inc., SSGT and Strategic Storage Trust IV, Inc., all public non-traded REITs focusing on self storage assets. The facilities offer affordable and accessible storage units for residential and commercial customers. In addition, they offer secure interior and exterior storage units as well as outside storage areas for vehicles, RVs and boats. Additional information is available at www.smartstopassetmanagement.com.This press release may contain certain forward-looking statements within the meaning of Section 27A of the Securities Act of 1933, as amended, and Section 21E of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as amended. Such forward-looking statements can generally be identified by our use of forward-looking terminology such as "may," "will," "expect," "intend," "anticipate," "estimate," "believe," "continue," or other similar words. Because such statements include risks, uncertainties and contingencies, actual results may differ materially from the expectations, intentions, beliefs, plans or predictions of the future expressed or implied by such forward-looking statements. These risks, uncertainties and contingencies include, but are not limited to: uncertainties relating to changes in general economic and real estate conditions; uncertainties relating to the implementation of our real estate investment strategy; uncertainties relating to financing availability and capital proceeds; uncertainties relating to the closing of property acquisitions; uncertainties related to the timing and availability of distributions; and other risk factors as outlined in the Company's public filings with the Securities and Exchange Commission. This is neither an offer nor a solicitation to purchase securities. To view the original version on PR Newswire, visit:http://www.prnewswire.com/news-releases/strategic-storage-growth-trust-inc-reports-2017-first-quarter-results-300460240.htmlReblogShareTweetShareRecently ViewedYour list is empty.What to Read NextPeople are 'mystified' by Amazon's Whole Foods acquisition, says investorCNBCThis Will Be In Everyone's Household By 2020Banyan HillSponsoredStarbucks’ $1.3B China Deal Is Its Biggest Acquisition EverInvestorPlaceTotal Ready to Make Acquisitions as Financial Strength GrowsBloombergStarbucks Has History of Making Bad Deals -- All 379 Teavana Stores to Now VanishThe StreetEngineer Finds Pattern; Makes Millions in StocksMoney MorningSponsoredTotal Says Its Looking For Acquisitions as Q2 Earnings Beat ExpectationsThe StreetTrump names John Kelly new chief of staff; Reince Priebus outCNBCThe 'two pizza rule' is a secret to productive meetings that helped Amazon CEO Jeff Bezos become one of the world's richest menBusiness InsiderZuckerberg Wife's Ambitious Secret Finally ExposedUNewz.MeSponsoredNorth Korea 2nd ICBM test puts much of US in range: expertsAssociated PressThe Revival of Main Street: Big Banks vs. Regional BanksInvestorPlaceChevron and Exxon Mobil have a tough path ahead: NYSE traderYahoo Finance VideoDiscover it: 4.8 out of 5 avg. by 24K+ customersDiscover CardSponsoredStocks mixed after heavy earnings weekThe real reason overseas manufacturing is coming to AmericaYahoo FinanceDonald Trump Tweet-Rages After John McCain Kills Obamacare Skinny RepealStan: Let trump rage.  McCain you did the right thing.Join the Conversation1 / 51.3k










Strategic Storage Growth Trust Inc. News | Commercial Property Executive






















Strategic Storage Growth Trust Inc.

View All Tags













Strategic Storage Acquires 510-Unit Facility in Sarasota, FL

The three-story structure includes 48,000 square feet of rental space. The SSGT portfolio currently consists of 19 operating self-storage facilities located in eight states.





South






Strategic Storage Buys 900-Unit Facility

The Garden Grove property offers roughly 95,000 rentable square feet and 59 RV storage spaces.





Los Angeles






SSGT Reaches $50 Million Equity Mark

Strategic Storage Growth Trust can now accept investments from Pennsylvania residents. 





Northeast






















Self-Storage REIT Buys Newly Developed Phoenix Facility


Strategic Storage Growth acquired a new 840-unit self storage project built by Glacier Development at 1500 East Baseline Road in Phoenix. 
Phoenix
01 June 2016 12:12










Strategic Storage Growth Plans Second Development in Canada


The self-storage REIT is planning to build a 900-unit facility in Ontario, Canada.
International
24 May 2016 15:08










SSGT to Lease up Metro Miami Self-Storage Facility in 2017


Strategic Storage Growth Trust agreed to purchase an upcoming Pembroke Pines development consisting of 880 climate-controlled units upon issuance of a certificate of occupancy.
Miami
29 April 2016 20:45










SSGT Adds another Self-Storage Facility to Its San Antonio Portfolio


SSGT paid $12.3 million for a self-storage facility in San Antonio, Texas. 
San Antonio
11 January 2016 21:10










Strategic Storage Growth Buys $26.7M Assets


Strategic Storage Growth Trust has expanded its portfolio with the acquisition of three self-storage facilities in Texas and Colorado. 
San Antonio
22 December 2015 19:33










Extra Space, SmartStop Self Storage’s Big-Ticket Merger


Extra Space Storage and SmartStop Self Storage, the second and seventh largest owners and operators of self-storage facilities in the U.S., will soon become one.
National
17 June 2015 12:12









                    More
                






















Top Stories







                    Sunfinity Solar: Solar Customers Shouldn’t Pay More for Elect…
                



28 July 2017 17:03







                    Center Core Buys Chicago-Area Office Campus
                



28 July 2017 17:01







                    GATX Moves to Chicago’s Willis Tower
                



28 July 2017 16:55







                    Sheraton DFW Airport Hotel Fetches $46M
                



28 July 2017 16:19







                    Kroger-Anchored Shopping Center Trades in Dallas
                



28 July 2017 14:10







More Top Stories




















